Sabaoth
Sabáoth.Sábbath.

n.s. [An Hebrew word signifying rest; sabbat, French; sabatum, Latin.]



 A day appointed by God among the Jews, and from them established among Christians for publick worship; the seventh day set apart from works of labour to be employed in piety.
Holy Lord God of sabaoth. Common Prayer.
                I purpose,And by our holy sabbath have I sworn,To have the due and forfeit of my bond. Shakespeare.
Glad we return'd up to the coasts of light,Ere sabbath ev'ning. Milton.
Here ev'ry day was sabbath: only freeFrom hours of pray'r, for hours of charity,Such as the Jews from servile toil releast,Where works of mercy were a part of rest:Such as blest angels exercise above,Vary'd with sacred hymns and acts of love;Such sabbaths as that one she now enjoys,Ev'n that perpetual one, which she employs:For such vicissitudes in heav'n there are,In praise alternate, and alternate pray'r. Dryden.
 Intermission of pain or sorrow; time of rest.
Never any sabbath of releaseCould free his travels and afflictions deep. Daniel's Civil War.
Nor can his blessed soul look down from heav'n,Or break th' eternal sabbath of his rest,To see her miseries on earth. Dryden.
Peaceful sleep out the sabbath of the tomb,And wake to raptures in a life to come. Pope.

Sabbath
Sabáoth.Sábbath.

n.s. [An Hebrew word signifying rest; sabbat, French; sabatum, Latin.]



 A day appointed by God among the Jews, and from them established among Christians for publick worship; the seventh day set apart from works of labour to be employed in piety.
Holy Lord God of sabaoth. Common Prayer.
                I purpose,And by our holy sabbath have I sworn,To have the due and forfeit of my bond. Shakespeare.
Glad we return'd up to the coasts of light,Ere sabbath ev'ning. Milton.
Here ev'ry day was sabbath: only freeFrom hours of pray'r, for hours of charity,Such as the Jews from servile toil releast,Where works of mercy were a part of rest:Such as blest angels exercise above,Vary'd with sacred hymns and acts of love;Such sabbaths as that one she now enjoys,Ev'n that perpetual one, which she employs:For such vicissitudes in heav'n there are,In praise alternate, and alternate pray'r. Dryden.
 Intermission of pain or sorrow; time of rest.
Never any sabbath of releaseCould free his travels and afflictions deep. Daniel's Civil War.
Nor can his blessed soul look down from heav'n,Or break th' eternal sabbath of his rest,To see her miseries on earth. Dryden.
Peaceful sleep out the sabbath of the tomb,And wake to raptures in a life to come. Pope.

Sabbathbreaker
Sábbathbreaker. n.s. [sabbath and break.] Violator of the sabbath day by labour or wickedness.
The usurer is the greatest sabbathbreaker, because his plough goeth every Sunday. Bacon's Essays.

Sabbatical
Sabbátical. adj. [sabbaticus, Lat. sabbatique, Fr. from sabbath.] Resembling the sabbath; enjoying or bringing intermission of labour.
The appointment and observance of the sabbatical year, and after the seventh sabbatical year, a year of jubilee, is a circumstance of great moment. Forbes.

Sabbatism
Sábbatism n.s. [from sabbatum, Latin.] Observance of the sabbath superstitiously rigid.

Sabine
Sábine. n.s. [sabine, Fr. sabina, Latin.] A plant.
Sabine or savin will make fine hedges, and may be brought into any form by clipping, much beyond any of the sorts of trees commonly made use of for that purpose. Mortimer.

Sable (adjective)
Sáble. adj. [Fr.] Black.  A word used by heralds and poets.
By this the drooping daylight 'gan to fade,And yield his room to sad succeeding night,Who with her sable mantle 'gan to shadeThe face of earth, and ways of living wight. Fairy Queen.
            With him inthron'dSat sable vested night, eldest of things,The consort of his reign. Milton's Paradise Lost.
They soon begin that tragick play,And with their smoaky cannons banish day:Night, horrour, slaughter, with confusion meet,And in their sable arms embrace the fleet. Waller.
Adoring first the genius of the place,And night, and all the stars that gild her sable throne. Dryd.

Sable (noun)
Sáble n.s. [zibella, Latin.] Fur.
Sable is worn of great personages, and brought out of Russia, being the fur of a little beast of that name, esteemed for the perfectness of the colour of the hairs, which are very black.  Hence sable, in heraldry, signifies the black colour in gentlemens arms. Peacham on Blazoning.
Furiously running in upon him, with tumultuous speech, he violently raught from his head his rich cap of sables. Knolles.
The peacocks plumes thy tackle must not fail,Nor the dear puchase of the sable's tail. Gay.

Sabliere
Sábliere. n.s. [French.]

 A sandpit. Bailey.

 [In carpentry.] A piece of timber as long, but not so thick, as a beam. Bailey.

Sabre
Sábre. n.s. [sabre, French; I suppose, of Turkish original.] A cymetar; a short sword with a convex edge; a faulchion.
To me the cries of fighting fields are charms;Keen by my sabre, and of proof my arms;I ask no other blessing of my stars,No prize but fame, no mistress but the wars. Dryden.
Seam'd o'er with wounds, which his own sabre gave,In the vile habit of a village slave,The foe deceiv'd. Pope's Odyssey.

Sabulosity
Sabulósity. n.s. [from sabulous.] Grittiness; sandiness.

Sabulous
Sábulous. adj. [sabulum, Latin.] Gritty; sandy.

Saccade
Saccáde. n.s. [French.] A violent check the rider gives his horse, by drawing both the reins very suddenly: a correction used when the horse bears heavy on the hand. Bailey.

Saccharine
Sáccharine. adj. [saccharum, Latin.] Having the taste or any other of the chief qualities of sugar.
Manna is an essential saccharine salt, sweating from the leaves of most plants. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Sacerdotal
Sacerdótal. adj. [sacerdotalis, Latin.] Priestly; belonging to the priesthood.
They have several offices and prayers, especially for the dead, in which functions they use sacerdotal garments. Stillingfl.
He fell violently upon me, without respect to my sacerdotal orders. Dryden's Spanish Friar.
If ample powers, granted by the rulers of this world, add dignity to the persons intrusted with these powers, behold the importance and extent of the sacerdotal commission. Atterbury.

Sachel
Sáchel. n.s. [sacculus, Lat.] A small sack or bag.

Sack (noun 1)
Sack. n.s. [,שק Hebrew; σάκκος; saccus, Latin; sæc, Sax.  It is observable of this word, that it is found in all languages, and it is therefore conceived to be antediluvian.]

 A bag; a pouch; commonly a large bag.
Our sacks shall be a mean to sack the city,And we be lords and rulers over Roan. Shak. Henry VI.
Vastius caused the authors of that mutiny to be thrust into sacks, and in the sight of the fleet cast into the sea. Knolles.
 The measure of three bushels.

 A woman's loose robe.

Sack (noun 2)
Sack. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Storm of a town; pillage; plunder.
          If Saturn's son bestowsThe sack of Troy, which he by promise owes,Then shall the conqu'ring Greeks thy loss restore. Dryden.
 A kind of sweet wine, now brought chiefly from the Canaries. [Sec, French, of uncertain etymology; but derived by Skinner, after Mandeslo, from Xeque, a city of Morocco.]
Please you drink a cup of sack. Shakespeare.
The butler hath great advantage to allure the maids with a glass of sack. Swift.

Sack (verb)
To Sack. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To put in bags.
Now the great work is done, the corn is ground,The grist is sack'd, and every sack well bound. Betterton.
 [From sacar, Spanish.] To take by storm; to pillage; to plunder.
Edward Bruce spoiled and burnt all the old English pale inhabitants and sacked and rased all cities and corporate towns. Spenser on Ireland.
I'll make thee stoop and bend thy knee,Or sack this country with a mutiny. Shakesp. Henry VI.
What armies conquer'd, perish'd with thy sword?What cities sack'd? Fairfax.
Who sees these dismal heaps, but would demandWhat barbarous invader sack'd the land? Denham.
The pope himself was ever after unfortunate, Rome being twice taken and sacked in his reign. South's Sermons.
The great magazine for all kinds of treasure is the bed of the Tiber: when the Romans lay under the apprehensions of seeing their city sacked by a barbarous enemy, they would take care to bestow such of their riches this way as could best bear the water. Addison.

Sackbut
Sáckbut. n.s. [sacabuche, Spanish; sambuca, Latin; sambuque, French.] A kind of pipe.
The trumpets, sackbuts, psalteries and fife,Make the sun dance. Shakesp. Coriolanus.

Sackcloath
Sáckcloath. n.s. [sack and cloath.] Cloath of which sacks are made; coarse cloath sometimes worn in mortification.
A sort of coarse stuff made of goats hair, of a black or dark colour, worn by soldiers and mariners; and used as a habit among the Hebrews in times of mourning and distress.  It was called sackcloth, either because sacks were made of this sort of stuff, or because haircloaths were straight and close like a sack. Calmet.
To augment her painful penance more,Thrice every week in ashes she did sit,And next her wrinkled skin rough sackcloth wore. F. Queen.
Thus with sackcloath I invest my woe,And dust upon my clouded forehead throw. Sandys.
Being clad in sackcloath, he was to lie on the ground, and constantly day and night to implore God's mercy for the sin he had committed. Ayliffe's Parergon.

Sacker
Sácker. n.s. [from sack.] One that takes a town.

Sackful
Sáckful. n.s. [sack and full.] Top full.
Wood goes about with sackfuls of dross, odiously misrepresenting his prince's countenance. Swift.

Sackposset
Sáckposset. n.s. [sack and posset.] A posset made of milk, sack, and some other ingredients.
Snuff the candles at supper on the table, because the burning snuff may fall into a dish of soup or sackposset. Swift.

Sacrament
Sácrament. n.s. [sacrement, Fr. sacramentum, Latin.]

 An oath; any ceremony producing an obligation.

 An outward and visible sign of an inward and spiritual grace.
As often as we mention a sacrament, it is improperly understood; for in the writings of the ancient fathers all articles which are peculiar to Christian faith, all duties of religion containing that which sense or natural reason cannot of itself discern, are most commonly named sacraments; our restraint of the word to some few principal divine ceremonies, importeth in every such ceremony two things, the substance of the ceremony itself, which is visible; and besides that, somewhat else more secret, in reference whereunto we conceive that ceremony to be a sacrament. Hooker.
 The eucharist; the holy communion.
Ten thousand French have ta'en the sacramentTo rive their dangerous artilleryUpon no Christian soul but English Talbot. Shakes. H. VI.
    As we have ta'en the sacrament,We will unite the white rose with the red. Shakesp. R. III.
Before the famous battle of Cressy, he spent the greatest part of the night in prayer; and in the morning received the sacrament, with his son, and the chief of his officers. Addison.

Sacramental
Sacraméntal. adj. [sacramental, Fr. from sacrament.] Constituting a sacrament; pertaining to a sacrament.
To make complete the outward substance of a sacrament, there is required an outward form, which form sacramental elements receive from sacramental words. Hooker.
The words of St. Paul are plain; and whatever interpretation can be put upon them, it can only vary the way of the sacramental efficacy, but it cannot evacuate the blessing. Taylor.

Sacramentally
Sacrame'ntally. adv. [from sacramental.] After the manner of a sacrament.
My body is sacramentally contained in this sacrament of bread. Hall.
The law of circumcision was meant by God sacramentally to impress the duty of strict purity. Hammond.

Saltinbanco
Salti'nbanco. n.s. [saltare in banco, to climb on a bench, as a mountebank mounts a bank.] A quack or mountebank.
Saltinbancoes, quacksalvers, and charlatans deceive them: were Æsop alive, the Piazza and Pont-neuf could not speak their fallacies. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
 He play'd the saltinbanco's part, Transform'd t' a Frenchman by my art. Hudibras.

Salvation
Salva'tion. n.s. [from salvo, Latin.] Preservation from eternal death; reception to the happiness of heaven.
 As life and death, mercy and wrath, are matters of meer understanding or knowledge, all mens salvation, and all mens endless perdition, are things so opposite, that whosoever doth affirm the one must necessarily deny the other. Hooker.
             Him the most High, Wrap'd in a balmy cloud with winged steeds, Did, as thou saw'st, receive; to walk with God High in salvation, and the climes of bliss, Exempt from death. Milton's Parad. Lost. b. xi.

Salve (noun)
Salve. n.s. [This word is originally and properly salf, which having salves in the plural, the singular in time was borrowed from it: ꞅalꝼ, Saxon, undoubtedly from salvus, Latin.]

 A glutinous matter applied to wounds and hurts; an emplaster.
Let us hence, my sov'reign, to provideA salve for any sore that may betide. Shak. Henry VI.
Go study salve and treacle; plyYour tenant's leg, or his sore eye. Cleaveland.
Sleep is pain's easiest salve, and doth fulfilAll offices of death, except to kill. Donne.
The royal sword thus drawn, has cur'd a wound,For which no other salve could have been found. Waller.
Though most were sorely wounded, none were slain;The surgeons soon despoil'd them of their arms,And some with salves they cure. Dryden.
 Help; remedy.
If they shall excommunicate me, hath the doctrine of meekness any salve for me then? Hammond.

Salve (verb)
To Salve. v.a. [salvo, Latin; or from the noun.]

 To cure with medicaments applied.
Many skilful leeches him abide,To salve his hurts. Fairy Queen.
It should be to little purpose for them to salve the wound, by making protestations in disgrace of their own actions. Hook.
The which if I perform, and do survive,I do beseech your majesty may salveThe long grown wounds of my intemperature. Sh. H. IV.
 To help; to remedy.
Some seek to salve their blotted nameWith others blot, 'till all do taste of shame. Sidney.
Our mother-tongue, which truly of itself is both full enough for prose, and stately enough for verse, hath long time been counted most bare and barren of both; which default, when as some endeavoured to salve and cure, they patched up the holes with rags from other languages. Spenser.
 To help or save by a salve, an excuse, or reservation.
Ignorant I am not how this is salved: they do it but after the truth is made manifest. Hooker.
          My more particular,And that, which most with you should salve my going,Is Fulvia's death. Shakesp. Ant. and Cleopatra.
The schoolmen were like the astronomers, who, to salve phœnomena, framed to their conceit eccentricks and epicycles; so they, to salve the practice of the church, had devised a great number of strange positions. Bacon.
There must be another state to make up the inequalities of this, and salve all irregular appearances. Atterbury.
This conduct might give Horace the hint to say, that when Homer was at a loss to bring any difficult matter to an issue, he laid his hero asleep, and this salved all difficulty. Broome.
 [From salve, Latin.] To salute. Obsolete.
That stranger knight in presence came,And goodly salved them; who nought againHim answered as courtesy became. Fairy Queen.

Sausage
Sáusage. n.s. [saucisse, French; salsum, Latin.] A roll or ball made commonly of pork or veal, and sometimes of beef, minced very small, with salt and spice; sometimes it is stuffed into the guts of fowls, and sometimes only rolled in flower.

Saxifragous
Sáxifragous. adj. [saxum and frago, Latin.] Dissolvent of the stone.
 Because goat's blood was found an excellent medicine for the stone, it might be conceived to be able to break a diamond; and so it came to be ordered that the goats should be fed on saxifragous herbs, and such as are conceived of power to break the stone. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Scalade
Scaláde.Scaládo.

n.s. [French; scalada, Spanish, from scala, Latin, a ladder.] A storm given to a place by raising ladders against the walls.


 What can be more strange than that we should within two months have won one town of importance by scalado, battered and assaulted another, and overthrown great forces in the field? Bacon.
 Thou raisedst thy voice to record the stratagems, the arduous exploits, and the nocturnal scalade of needy heroes, the terror of your peaceful citizens. Arbuthn. Hist. of J. Bull.

Scalado
Scaláde.Scaládo.

n.s. [French; scalada, Spanish, from scala, Latin, a ladder.] A storm given to a place by raising ladders against the walls.


 What can be more strange than that we should within two months have won one town of importance by scalado, battered and assaulted another, and overthrown great forces in the field? Bacon.
 Thou raisedst thy voice to record the stratagems, the arduous exploits, and the nocturnal scalade of needy heroes, the terror of your peaceful citizens. Arbuthn. Hist. of J. Bull.

Scare
To Scare. v.a. [scorare, Italian. Skinner.] To fright; to frighten; to affright; to terrify; to strike with sudden fear.
 They have scared away two of my best sheep, which, I fear, the wolf will sooner find than the master. Shakespeare.
 Poor Tom hath been scared out of his good wits. Shakesp.
My grained ash an hundred times hath broke, And scar'd the moon with splinters. Shak. Coriolanus.
 The noise of thy cross-bow Will scare the herd, and so my shoot is lost. Shakes. H. VI.
 Scarecrows are set up to keep birds from corn and fruit; and some report that the head of a wolf, whole, dried, and hanged up in a dovehouse, will scare away vermin. Bacon.
 The wing of the Irish was so grievously either galled or scared therewith, that being strangers, and in a manner neutrals, they had neither good heart to go forward, nor good liking to stand still, nor good assurance to run away. Hayward.
                 The light Waves threaten now, as that was scar'd by fire. Waller.
 One great reason why mens god purposes so often fail, is, that when they are devout, or scared, they then in the general resolve to live religiously. Calamy's Sermons.
Let wanton wives by death be scar'd; But, to my comfort, I'm prepar'd. Prior.

Scholiast
Schóliast. n.s. [scholiaste, French; scholiastes, Latin.] A writer of explanatory notes.
 The title of this satyr, in some manuscripts, was the reproach of idleness; though in others of the scholiasts 'tis inscribed against the luxury of the rich. Dryden.
 What Gellius or Stobæ cook'd before, Or chew'd by blind old scholiasts o'er and o'er. Dunciad.

Sciolist
Sciólist. n.s. [sciolus, Latin.] One who knows many things superficially.
'Twas this vain idolizing of authors which gave birth to that silly vanity of impertinent citations: these ridiculous fooleries signify nothing to the more generous discerners, but the pedantry of the affected sciolists. Glanv. Sceps.
These passages, in that book, were enough to humble the presumption of our modern sciolists, if their pride were not as great as their ignorance. Temple.

Scuses
'Scuses. For excuses.
         I shifted him away, And laid good 'scuses on your exstasy. Shakesp. Othello.

Scutiform
Scútiform. adj. [scutiformis, Latin.] Shaped like a shield.

Sea
Sea. n.s. [sæ, Saxon; see, or zee, Dutch.]

 The ocean; the water opposed to the land.
Will all great Neptune's ocean wash this bloodClean from my hand? No, this my hand will ratherThy multitudinous sea incarnardine,Making the green one red. Shakesp. Macbeth.
The rivers run into the sea. Carew.
He made the sea, and all that is therein. Ex. xx. 11.
So do the winds and thunders cleanse the air,So working seas settle and purge the wine. Davies.
Amphibious between sea and landThe river horse. Milton.
            Some leviathan,Haply slumb'ring on the Norway foam,The pilot of some small night-founder'd skiffDeeming some island, oft as seamen tell,With fixed anchor in his scaly rind,Moors by his side under the lee, while nightInvests the sea. Milton.
Small fragments of shells, broken by storms on some shores, are used for manuring of sea land. Woodward.
They put to sea with a fleet of three hundred sail. Arbuthn.
Sea racing dolphins are train'd for our motion,Moony tides swelling to roll us ashore. Dryden's Albion.
But like a rock unmov'd, a rock that bravesThe raging tempest, and the rising waves,Propp'd on himself he stands: his solid sideWash off the sea weeds, and the sounding tides. Dryden.
The sea could not be much narrower than it is, without a great loss to the world. Bentley.
So when the first bold vessel dar'd the seas,High on the stern the Thracian rais'd his strain,While Argo saw her kindred treesDescend from Pelion to the main. Pope.
 A collection of water; a lake.
Jesus walking by the sea of Galilee, saw two brethren. Mat. iv. 18.
 Proverbially for any large quantity.
That sea of blood which hath in Ireland been barbarously shed, is enough to drown in eternal infamy and misery the malicious author and instigator of its effusion. King Charles.
 Any thing rough and tempestuous.
To sorrow abandon'd, but worse felt within,And in a troubled sea of passion tost. Milton.
 Half Seas over. Half drunk.
The whole magistracy was pretty well disguised before I gave 'em the slip: our friend the alderman was half seas over before the bonfire was out. Spectator.
Sea is often used in composition, as will appear in the following examples.

Searover
Searóver. n.s. [sea and rove.] A pirate.

Secretory
Sécretory. adj. [from secretus, Latin.] Performing the office of secretion.
All the glands are a congeries of vessels complicated together, whereby they give the blood time to separate through the capillary vessels into the secretory, which afterwards exonerate themselves into one duct. Ray.

Sedan
Sedán. n.s. [from sedes, Latin.] A kind of portable coach; a chair.
 Some beg for absent persons, feign them sick, Close mew'd in their sedans for want of air, And for their wives produce an empty chair. Dryden.
 By a tax of Cato's it was provided, that women's wearing cloaths, ornament and sedan, exceeding 121 l. 1 s. 10 d. halfpenny, should pay 30 s. in the hundred pound value. Arbuthn.

Sedentary
Sédentary. adj. [sedentaire, French; sedentario, Italian; sedentarius, from sedeo, Latin]

 Passed in sitting still; wanting motion or action.
A sedentary life, appropriate to all students, crushes the bowels; and, for want of stirring the body, suffers the spirits to lie dormant. Harvey on Consumptions.
 The blood of labouring people is more dense and heavy than of those who live a sedentary life. Arbuthnot.
 Torpid; inactive; sluggish; motionless.
             The sedentary earth, That better might with far less compass move, Serv'd by more noble than herself, attains Her end without least motion. Milton.
         'Till length of years And sedentary numbness, craze my limbs To a contemptible old age obscure. Milton's Agonistes.
 The soul, considered abstractedly from its passions, is of a remiss sedentary nature, slow in its resolves, and languishing in its executions. Addison's Spectator.

Segnity
Ségnity. n.s. [from segnis, Latin.] Sluggishness; inactivity. Dict.

Seize (verb active)
To Seize. v.a. [saisir, French.]

 To take possession of; to grasp; to lay hold on; to fasten on.
In her sad breast the prince's fortunes rowl,And hope and doubt alternate seize her soul. Pope.
 To take forcible possession of by law.
An escheator of London had arrested a clothier that was outlawed, and seized his goods. Camden.
It was judged by the highest kind of judgment, that he should be banished, and his whole estate confiscated and seized. Bacon.
 To make possessed.
So th' one for wrong, the other strives for right:As when a griffin, seized of his prey,A dragon fierce encount'rith in his flight,Through wildest air making his idle way. Fa. Queen.
So Pluto, seiz'd of Proserpine, convey'dTo hell's tremenduous gloom th' affrighted maid,There grimly smil'd, pleas'd with the beauteous prize,Nor envy'd Jove his sunshine and his skies. Addis. Cato.

Seize (verb neuter)
To Seize. v.n. To fix the grasp or the power on any thing.
              Fairest Cordelia,Thee and thy virtues here I seize upon:Be't lawful I take up what's cast away? Shakesp. K. Lear.
Where there is a design of supplanting, that necessarily requires another of accusing: even Jezebel projects not to seize on Naboth's vineyard without a precedent charge. Dec. of Piety.

Seizure
Séizure. n.s. [from seize.]

 The act of seizing.

 The thing seized.
Sufficient that thy pray'rs are heard, and death,Then due by sentence when thou did'st transgress,Defeated of his seizure, many daysGiv'n thee of grace. Milton's Paradise Lost.
 The act of taking forcible possession.
Thy lands, and all things that thou do'st call thine,Worth seizure, do we seize into our hands. Shakespeare.
In the general town he maintained a seizure, and possession of the whole. Wotton.
Henry continued to burn protestants, after he had cast off the pope; and his seizure of ecclesiastical revenues cannot be reckoned as a mark of the church's liberty. Swift.
 Gripe; possession.
And shall these hands, so lately purg'd of blood,Unyoke this seizure, and this kind regreet? Shakespeare.
Make o'er thy honour by a deed of trust,And give me seizure of the mighty wealth. Dryden.
 Catch.
Let there be no sudden seizure of a lapsed syllable to play upon it. Watts.

Selenographical
Selenogra'phical.Selenogra'phick.

adj. [selenographique, Fr. from selenography.] Belonging to selenography.

Selenographick
Selenogra'phical.Selenogra'phick.

adj. [selenographique, Fr. from selenography.] Belonging to selenography.

Selenography
Sele'nography. n.s. [selenographie, Fr. σελἠνη and γρἀφω.] A description of the moon.
 Hevelius, in his accurate selenography, or description of the moon, hath well translated the known appellations of regions, seas, and mountains, unto the parts of that luminary. Brown.

Self


Sequestrable
Sequéstrable. adj. [from sequestrate.]

 Subject to privation.

Capable of separation.
Hartshorn, and divers other bodies belonging to the animal kingdom, abound with a not uneasily sequestrable salt. Boyle.

Sequestrate
To Sequéstrate. v.n. To sequester; to separate from company.
In general contagions more perish for want of necessaries than  by the malignity of the disease, they being sequestrated from mankind. Arbuthnot on Air.

Sequestration
Sequestrátion. n.s. [sequestration, Fr. from sequestrate.]

 Separation; retirement.
His addiction was to courses vain;I never noted in him any study,Any retirement, any sequestrationFrom open haunts and popularity. Shak. Henry V.
There must be leisure, retirement, solitude, and a sequestration of a man's self from the noise and toils of the world; for truth scorns to be seen by eyes too much fixt upon inferiour objects. South's Sermons.
 Disunion; disjunction.
The metals remain unsevered, the fire only dividing the body into smaller particles, hindering rest and continuity, without any sequestration of elementary particles. Boyle.
 State of being set aside.
Since Henry Monmouth first began to reign,Before whose glory I was great in arms,This loathsome sequestration have I had. Shakesp. H. VI.
 Deprivation of the use and profits of a possession.
If there be a single spot in the globe more barren, the rector or vicar may be obliged, by the caprice or pique of the bishop, to build upon it, under pain of sequestration. Swift.

Sequestrator
Sequestrátor. n.s. [from sequestrate.] One who takes from a man the profit of his possessions.
I am fallen into the hands of publicans and sequestrators, and they have taken all from me. Taylor.

Seraglio
Seráglio. n.s. [Italian, perhaps of Oriental original.  The g is lost in the pronunciation.]  A house of women kept for debauchery.
There is a great deal more solid content to be found in a constant course of well living, than in the voluptuousness of a seraglio. Norris.

Seraph
Séraph. n.s. [.שראף] One of the order of angels.
He is infinitely more remote in the real excellency of his nature, from the highest and perfectest of all created beings, than the purest seraph is from the most contemptible part of matter, and consequently must infinitely exceed what our narrow understanding can conceive of him. Locke.
As full, as perfect in vile man that mourns,As the rapt seraph that adores and burns. Pope.

Seraphical
Seráphical.Seráphick.

adj. [seraphique, French; from seraph.] Angelick; angelical.


Love is curious of little things, desiring to be of angelical purity, of perfect innocence, and seraphical fervour. Taylor.
Seraphick arms and trophies. Milton.
'Tis to the world a secret yet,Whether the nymph, to please her swain,Talks in a high romantick strain;Or whether he at last descendsTo like with less seraphick ends. Swift.

Seraphick
Seráphical.Seráphick.

adj. [seraphique, French; from seraph.] Angelick; angelical.


Love is curious of little things, desiring to be of angelical purity, of perfect innocence, and seraphical fervour. Taylor.
Seraphick arms and trophies. Milton.
'Tis to the world a secret yet,Whether the nymph, to please her swain,Talks in a high romantick strain;Or whether he at last descendsTo like with less seraphick ends. Swift.

Seraphim
Séraphim. n.s. [This is properly the plural of seraph, and therefore cannot have s added; yet, in compliance with our language, seraphims is sometimes written.] Angels of one of the heavenly orders.
To thee cherubim and seraphim continually do cry. Com. Pr.
Then flew one of the seraphims unto me, having a live coal in his hand. Is. vi. 6.
Of seraphim another row. Milton.

Servant (noun)
Sérvant. n.s. [servant, French; servus, Latin.]

 One who attends another, and acts at his command. The correlative of master.
 We are one in fortune; both Fell by our servants, by those men we lov'd most. Shakesp.
 I had rather be a country servant maid, Than a great queen with this condition. Shak. R. III.
                 He disdain'd not Thenceforth the form of servant to assume. Milton.
 For master or for servant here to call Was all alike, where only two were all. Dryden.
 One in a state of subjection. Unusual.
                 Being unprepar'd, Our will became the servant to defect, Which else should free have wrong'd. Shak. Macbeth.
 A word of civility used to superiours or equals.
 This subjection, due from all men to all men, is something more than the compliment of course, when our betters tell us they are our humble servants, but understand us to be their slaves. Swift.

Service


Sess


Session


Sesterce


Set (noun)


Set (participial adjective)


Set (verb active)
To Set. v.a. preterite I set; part. pass. I am set. [Satgan, or satyan, Gothic; ꞅꞇꞇan, Saxon; setten, Dutch.]

 To place; to put in any situation or place; to put.
                      E're I could Give him that parting kiss which I had set Betwixt two charming words, comes in my father. Shakes.
 But that my admirable dexterity of wit, counterfeiting the action of an old woman, delivered me, the knave constable had set me i' th' common stocks for a witch. Shakesp.
 They that are younger have me in derision, whose fathers I would have disdained to have set with the dogs of my flock. Job. xxx. i.
 He that hath received his testimony, hat set to his seal, that God is true. John iii. 33.
  They have set her a bed in the midst of the slain. Ezek. xxxii.
 God set them in the firmament, to give light upon the earth. Gen. i. 17.
 In their setting of their threshold by my thresholds, they have defiled my holy name. Ezek. xliii. 8.
 I have set thee for a tower among my people. Jer. vi. 27.
                  By his aid aspiring To set himself in glory above his peers. Milton.
 She sets the bar that causes all my pain; One gift refused, makes all their bounty vain. Dryd.
 The lives of the revealers may be justly enough set over against the revelation, to find whether they agree. Atterb.
 To put into any condition, state, or posture.
 They thought the very disturbance of things established an hire sufficient to set them on work. Hooker.
 That man that sits within a monarch's heart, Would he abuse the count'nance of the king, Alack! what mischiefs might he set abroach? Shakesp.
                Our princely general, Will give you audience; and wherein It shall appear that your demands are just, You shall enjoy them; ev'ry thing set off That might so much as think you enemies. Shakesp.
 This present enterprize set off his head, I do not think a braver gentleman Is now alive. Shakesp. Hen. IV.
 Ye caused every man his servant, whom he had set at liberty, to return. Jer. xxxiv. 16.
 Every sabbath ye shall set it in order. Lev. xxiv. 8.
 I am come to set a man at variance against his father. Mat.
 Thou shalt pour out into all those vessels, and set aside that which is full. 2 Kings iv. 4.
 The beauty of his ornament he set in majesty, but they made images; therefore have I set it far from them. Ezek.
 The gates of thy land shall be set wide open. Nah. iii. 13.
 The fathers have eaten a sour grape, and the children's teeth are set on edge. Jer. xxxi. 20.
 The tongue defileth the whole body, and setteth on fire the course of nature, and is set on fire of hell. Ja. iii. 6.
 The shipping might be set on work by fishing, by transportations from port to port. Bacon.
 This wheel set on going, did pour a war upon the Venetians with such a tempest, as Padua and Trevigi were taken from them. Bacon.
 That this may be done with the more advantage, some hours must be set apart for this examination. Duppa.
 Finding the river fordable at the foot of the bridge, he set over his horse. Hayward.
 Equal success had set these champions high, And both resolv'd to conquer, or to die. Waller.
 Nothing renders a man so inconsiderable; for it sets him above the meaner sort of company, and makes him intolerable to the better. Govern. of the Tongue.
 Some are reclaimed by punishment, and some are set right by good nature. L'Estrange.
 The fire was form'd, she sets the kettle on. Dryd.
              Leda's present came, To ruin Troy, and set the world on flame. Dryd.
 Set calf betimes to school, and let him be Instructed there in rules of husbandry. Dryd.
 Over labour'd with so long a course, 'Tis time to set at ease the smoking horse. Dryd.
 The punish'd crime shall set my soul at ease, And murm'ring manes of my friend appease. Dryd.
                  Jove call'd in haste The son of Maia with severe decree, To kill the keeper, and to set her free. Dryd.
 If such a tradition were at any time endeavoured to be set on foot, it is not easy to imagine how it should at first gain entertainment. Tillotson.
 When the father looks sour on the child, every body else should put on the same coldness, till forgiveness asked, and a reformation of his fault has set him right again, and restored him to his former credit. Locke on Educat.
 His practice must by no means cross his precepts, unless he intend to set him wrong. Locke on Educat.
 If the fear of absolute and irresistible power set it on upon the mind, the idea is likely to sink the deeper. Locke.
 When he has once chosen it, it raises desire that proportionably gives him uneasiness which determines his will, and sets him at work in pursuit of his choice, on all occasions. Locke.
                      This river, When nature's self lay ready to expire, Quench'd the dire flame that set the world on fire. Addis.
 The many hospitals every where erected, serve rather to encourage idleness in the people than to set them at work. Add.
 A couple of lovers agreed at parting, to set aside one half hour in the day to think of each other. Addis.
 Your fortunes place you far above the necessity of learning, but nothing can set you above the ornament of it. Felton.
 Their first movement and impressed motions demand the impulse of an almighty hand to set them agoing. Cheyne.
 Men of quality look upon it as one of their distinguishing privileges, not to set other people at ease, with the loss of the least of their own. Pope.
 That the wheels were but small, may be guessed from a custom they have of taking them off, and setting them on. Pope.
 Be frequent in setting such causes at work, whose effects you desire to know. Watts.
 To make motionless; to fix immoveably.
 Struck with the sight, inanimate she seems, Set are her eyes, and motionless her limbs. Garth.
 To fix; to state by some rule.
 Hereon the prompter falls to flat railing in the bitterest terms; which the gentleman with a set gesture and countenance still soberly related, until the ordinary, driven at last into a mad rage, was fain to give over. Carew.
 The town of Bern has handsome fountains planted, at set distances, from one end of the streets to the other. Addison.
 To regulate; to adjust.
 In court they determine the king's good by his desires, which is a kind of setting the sun by the dial. Suckling.
 God bears a different respect to places set apart and consecrated to his worship, to what he bears to places designed to common uses. South.
 Our palates grow into a liking of the seasoning and cookery, which by custom they are set to. Locke.
 He rules the church's blest dominions, And sets men's faith by his opinions. Prior.
 Against experience he believes, He argues against demonstration; Plead's when his reason he deceives, And sets his judgment by his passion. Prior.
 To fit to musick; to adapt with notes.
 Set thy own songs, and sing them to thy lute. Dryden.
 Grief he tames that fetters it in verse; But when I have done so, Some man, his art or voice to show,


Doth set and sing my pain; And by delighting many, frees again Grief, which verse did restrain. Donne.



 I had one day set the hundredth psalm, and was singing the first line, in order to put the congregation into the tune. Spect.
 To plant, not sow.
 Whatsoever fruit useth to be set upon a root or a slip, if it be sown, will degenerate. Bacon's Nat. History.
               I prostrate fell, To shrubs and plants my vile devotion paid, And set the bearded leek to which I pray'd. Prior.
 To intersperse or mark with any thing.
          As with stars, their bodies all And wings were set with eyes. Milton.
 High on their heads, with jewels richly set, Each lady wore a radiant coronet. Dryden.
 The body is smooth on that end, and on this 'tis set with ridges round the point. Woodward.
 To reduce from a fractured or dislocated state.
 Can honour set to a leg? no: or an arm? no: honour hath no skill in surgery then? no. Shakesp. Henry IV.
 Considering what an orderly life I had led, I only commanded that my arm and leg should be set, and my body anointed with oil. G. Herbert.
 The fracture was of both the focils of the left leg: he had been in great pain from the time of the setting. Wiseman.
 Credit is gained by course of time, and seldom recovers a strain; but if broken, is never well set again. Temple.
10. To fix the affection; to determine the resolution.
Set your affection on things above, not on things on the earth. Col. iii.2.
They should set their hope in God, and not forget his works. Ps. lxxviii. 7.
Because sentence against an evil work is not executed speedily, the heart of men is fully set in them to do evil. Eccl.
Set to work millions of spinning worms,That in their green shops weave the smooth hair'd silkto deck her sons. Milt.
Set not thy heart Thus overfond on that which is not thine. Milton.
When we are well, our hearts are set,Which way we care not, to be rich or great. Denham.
Our hearts are so much set upon the value of the benefits received, that we never think of the bestower. L'Estrange.
These bubbles of the shallowest, emptiest sorrow,Which children vent for toys, and women rainFor any trifle their fond hearts are set on. Dryd. and Lce.
Should we set our hearts only upon these things, and be able to taste no pleasure but what is sensual, we must be extremely miserable when we come unto the other world, because we should meet with nothing to entertain ourselves. Tillotson.
No sooner is one action dispatched, which we are set upon, but another uneasiness is ready to set us on work. Locke.
Minds, altogether set on trade and profit, often contract a certain narrowness of temper. Addison.
Men take an ill-natured pleasure in disappointing us in what our hearts are most set upon. Addison's Spectator.
An Englishman, who has any degree of reflection, cannot be better awakened to a sense of religion in general, than by observing how the minds of all mankind are set upon this important point, and how every nation is attentive to the great business of their being. Addison.
I am much concerned when I see young gentlemen of fortune so wholly set upon pleasures, that they neglect all improvements in wisdom and knowledge. Addison.
11. To predetermine; to settle.
We may still doubt whether the Lord, in such indifferent ceremonies as those whereof we dispute, did frame his people of set purpose unto any utter dissimilitude with Egyptians, or with any other nation. Hooker.
He remembers only the name of Conon, and forgets the other on set purpose, to show his country swain was no great scholar. Dryden.
12. To establish; to appoint; to fix.
Of all helps for due performance of this service, the greatest is that very set and standing order itself, which, framed with common advice, hath for matter and form prescribed whatsoever is herein publickly done. Hooker.
It pleased the king to send me, and I set him a time. Neh. ii.
Am I a sea, or a whale, that thou settest a watch over me? Job vii. 12.
He setteth an end to darkness, and searcheth out all perfection. Job xxviii. 3.
In studies, whatsoever a man commandeth upon himself, let him set hours for it; but whatsoever is agreeable to his nature, let him take no care for any set times: for his thoughts will fly to it of themselves, so as the spaces of other business or studies will suffice. Bacon.
For using set and prescribed forms, there is no doubt but that wholsome words, being known, are aptest to excite judicious and fervent affections. King Charles.
His seed, when is not set, shall bruise my head. Milton.
Though set form of prayer be an abomination,Set forms of petitions find great approbation. Denham.
Set places and set hours are but parts of that worship we owe. South.
That law cannot keep men from taking more use than you set, the want of money being that alone which regulates its price, will appear, if we consider how hard it is to set a price upon unnecessary commodities; how impossible it is to set a rate upon victuals in a time of famine. Locke.
Set him such a talk, to be done in such a time. Locke.
As in the subordinations of government the king is offended by any insults to an inferiour magistrate, so the sovereign ruler of the universe is affronted by a breach of allegiance to those whom he has set over us. Addison.
Take set times of meditating on what is future. Atterbury.
Should a man go about, with never so set study and design, to describe such a natural form of the year as that which is at present established, he could scarcely ever do it in so few words that were so fit. Woodward.
13. To exhibit; to display; to propose. With before.
Through the variety of my reading, I set before me many examples both of ancient and later times. Bacon.
Reject not then what offer'd means: who knowsBut God hath set before us, to return theeHome to thy country and his sacred house? Milton.
Long has my soul desir'd this time and place,To set before your sight your glorious race. Dryden.
All that can be done is to set the thing before men, and to offer it to their choice. Tillotson.
A spacious veil from his broad shoulders flew,That set th' unhappy Phaeton to view:The flaming chariot and the steeds it shew'd,And the whole fable in the mantle glow'd. Addison.
When his fortune sets before him allThe pomps and pleasures that his soul can wish,His rigid virtue will accept of none. Addison's Cato.
He supplies his not appearing in the present scene of action, by setting his character before us, and continually forcing his patience, prudence, and valour upon our observation. Broome.
14. To value; to estimate; to rate.
Be you contentedTo have a son set your decrees at nought?To pluck down justice from your awful bench,To trip the course of law? Shakes. H IV.
The backwardness parents shew in divulging their faults, will make them set a greater value on their credit themselves, and teach them to be the more careful to preserve the good opinion of others. Locke.
If we act by several broken views, and will not only be virtuous, but wealthy, popular, and every thing that has a value set upon it by the world, we shall live and die in misery. Addis.
Have I not set at nought my noble birth,A spotless fame, and an unblemished race,The peace of innocence, and pride of virtue?My prodigality has giv'n thee all. Rowe's Jane Shore.
Though the same sun, with all diffusive rays,Blush in the rose and in the diamond blaze,We prize the stronger effort of his pow'r,And always set the gem above the flow'r. Pope.
15. To stake at play.
What sad disorders play begets!Desp'rate and mad, at length he setsThose darts, whose points make gods adore. Prior.
16. To offer a wager at dice to another.
Who sets me else? I'll throw at all. Shakesp. R. II.
17. To fix in metal.
Think so vast a treasure as your sonToo great for any private man's possession;And him too rich a jewel to be setIn vulgar metal, or vulgar use. Dryden.
He may learn to cut, polish, and set precious stones. Locke.
18. To embarrass; to distress; to perplex. [This is used, I think, by mistake, for beset: as,
Adam, hard beset, replied. Milton.]
Those who raise popular mumurs and discontents against his majesty's government, that they find so very few and so very improper occasions for them, shew how hard they are set in this particular, represent the bill as a grievance. Addis.
19. To fix in an artificial manner, so as to produce a particular effect.
The proud have laid a snare for me, they have set gins. Ps.
20. To apply to something.
Unto thy brother thou shalt not lend upon usury, that the Lord may bless thee in all that thou settest thine hand to. Deut.
With whate'er gall thou set'st thyself to write,Thy inoffensive satires never bite. Dryden.
21. To fix the eyes.
I will set mine eyes upon them for good, and bring them again to this land. Jer. xxiv. 6.
Joy salutes me when I set my blest eyes on Amoret. Waller.
22. To offer for a price.
There is not a more wicked thing than a covetous man; for such an one setteth his own soul to sale. Ecclus. x. 9.
23. To place in order; to frame.
After it was framed, and ready to be set together, he was, with infinite labour and charge, carried by land with camels, through that hot and sandy country, from Caire to Suetia. Knolles's History of the Turks.
24. To station; to place.
Cœnus has betrayedThe bitter truths that our loose court upbraid:Your friend was set upon you for a spy,And on his witness you are doom'd to die. Dryden.
25. To oppose.
Will you set your wit to a fools? Shakespeare.
26. To bring to a fine edge: as, to set a razor.
27. To Set about. To apply to.
They should make them play-games, or endeavor it, and set themselves about it. Locke.
28. To Set against. To place in a state of enmity or opposition.
The terrors of God do set themselves in array against me. Job vi. 4.
The king of Babylon set himself against Jerusalem. Ezek.
The devil hath reason to set himself against it; for nothing is more destructive to him than a soul armed with prayer. Duppa.
There should be such a being as assists us against our worst enemies, and comforts us under our sharpest suffering, when all other things set themselves against us. Tillotson.
29. To Set against. To oppose; to place in rhetorical opposition.
This perishing of the world in a deluge is set against, or compared with, the perishing of the world in the conflagration. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
30. To Set apart. To neglect for a season.
They highly commended his forwardness, and all other matters for that time set apart. Knolles.
31. To Set aside. To omit for the present.
Set your knighthood and your soldiership aside, and give me leave to tell you that you lie in your throat. Shakesp. H. IV.
In 1585 followed the prosperous expedition of Drake and Carlile into the West Indies; in the which I set aside the taking of St. Jago and St. Domingo in Hispaniola, as surprizes rather than encounters. Bacon.
My highest interest is not to be deceived about these matters; therefore, setting aside all other considerations, I will endeavor to know the truth, and yield to that. Tillotson.
32. To Set aside. To reject.
I'll look into the pretensions of each, and shew upon what ground 'tis that I embrace that of the deluge, and set aside all the rest. Woodward's Nat. History.
No longer now does my neglected mindIts wonted stores and old ideas find:Fix'd judgment there no longer does abide,To taste the true, or set the false aside.
33. To Set aside. To abrogate; to annul.
Several innovations, made to the detriment of the English merchant, are now entirely set aside.  Addison.
There may beReasons of so much pow'r and cogent force,As may ev'n set aside this right of birth:If sons have rights, yet fathers have 'em too. Rowe.
He shows what absurdities follow upon such a supposition, and the greater those absurdities are, the more strongly do they evince the falsity of that supposition from whence they flow, and consequently the truth of the doctrine set aside by that supposition. Atterbury.
34. To Set by. To regard; to esteem.
David behaved himself more wisely than all, so that his name was much set by. 1 Sa. xviii. 30.
35. To Set by. To reject or omit for the present.
You shall hardly edify me, that those nations might not, by the law of nature, have been subdued by any nation that had only policy and moral virtue; though the propagation of the faith, whereof we shall speak in the proper place, were set by, and not made part of the case. Bacon.
36. To Set down. To mention; to explain; to relate in writing.
They have set down, that a rose set by garlick is sweeter, because the more fetid juice goeth into the garlick. Bacon.
Some rules were to be set down for the government of the army. Clarendon.
I shall set down an account of a discourse I chanced to have with one of these rural statesmen. Addison.
37. To Set down. To register or note in any book or paper; to put in writing.
Let those that play your clowns speak no more than is set down for them. Shakesp. Hamlet.
Every man, careful of virtuous conversation, studious of scripture, and given unto any abstinence in diet, was set down in his calendar of suspected Priscilianists. Hooker.
TakeOne half of my commission, and set downAs best thou art experienc'd, since thou know'stThy country's strength and weakness. Shak. Coriolanus.
The reasons that led me into the meaning which prevailed on my mind, are set down. Locke.
An eminent instance of this, to shew what use can do, I shall set down. Locke.
I cannot forbear setting down the beautiful description Claudian has made of a wild beast, newly brought from the woods, and making its first appearance in a full amphitheatre. Addison.
38. To Set down. To fix on a resolve.
Finding him so resolutely set down, that he was neither by fair nor foul means, but only by force, to be removed out of his town, he inclosed the same round. Knolles.
39. To Set down. To fix; to establish.
This law we may name eternal, being that order which God before all others hath set down with himself, for himself to do all things by. Hooker.
40. To Set forth. To publish; to promulgate; to make appear.
My willing love,The rather by these arguments of fear,Set forth in your pursuit. Shakes. Twelfth Night.
The poems, which have been so ill set forth under his name, are as he first writ them. Waller.
41. To Set forth. To raise; to send out.
Our merchants, to their great charges, set forth fleets to descry the seas. Abbot.
The Venetian admiral had a fleet of sixty gallies, set forth by the Venetians. Knolles's Hist. of the Turks.
When poor Rutilus spends all his worth,In hopes of setting one good dinner forth,'Tis downright madness. Dryden's Juvenal.
42. To Set forth. To display; to explain.
As for words to set forth such lewdness, it is not hard for them to give a goodly and painted shew thereunto, borrowed even from the praises proper to virtue. Spenser.
So little have these false colours dishonoured painting, that they have only served to set forth her praise, and to make her merit further known. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
43. To Set forth. To arrange; to place in order.
Up higher to the plain, where we'll set forthIn best appointment all our regiments. Shakesp. K. John.
44. To Set forth. To show; to exhibit.
To render our errours more monstrous, and what unto a miracle sets forth the patience of God, he hath endeavoured to make the world believe he was God himself. Browne.
Whereas it is commonly set forth green or yellow, it is inclining to white. Browne's Vulg. Err.
To set forth great things by small. Milton.
The two humours of a chearful trust in providence, and a suspicious diffidence of it, are very well set forth here for our instruction. L'Estrange.
45. To Set forward. To advance; to promote.
They yield that reading may set forward, but not begin the work of salvation. Hooker.
Amongst them there are not those helps which others have, to set them forward in the way of life. Hooker.
In the external form of religion, such things as are apparently or can be sufficiently proved effectual, and generally fit to set forward godliness, either as betokening the greatness of God, or as beseeming the dignity of religion, or as concuring with celestial impressions in the minds of men, may be reverently thought of. Hooker.
They mar my path, they set forward my calamity. Job.
Dung or chalk, applied seasonably to the roots of trees, doth set them forwards. Bacon's Nat. History.
46. To Set in. To put in a way to begin.
If you please to assist and set me in, I will recollect myself. Collier.
47. To Set off. To decorate; to recommend; to adorn; to embellish. It anwers to the French relever.
Like bright metal on a sullen ground,My reformation, glittering o'er my fault,Shall shew more goodly, and attract more eyes,Than that which hath no foil to set it off. Shak. H. IV.
The prince put thee into my service for no other reason than to set me off. Shakesp. Henry. IV.
Neglect not the examples of those that have carried themselves ill in the same place; not to set off thyself by taxing their memory, but to direct thyself what to avoid. Bacon.
May you be happy, and your sorrows pastSet off those joys I wish may ever last. Waller.
The figures of the groupes must contrast each other by their several positions: thus in a play some characters must be raised to oppose others, and to set them off. Dryden.
The men, whose hearts are aimed at, are the occasion that one part of the face lies under a kind of disguise, while the other is so much set off, and adorned by the owner. Addison.
Their women are perfect mistresses in shewing themselves to the best advantage: they are always gay and sprightly, and set off the worst faces with the best airs. Addison.
The general good sense and worthiness of his character, makes his friends observe these little singularities as foils, that rather set off than blemish his good qualities. Addison.
The work will never take, if it is not set off with proper scenes. Addison.
Claudian sets off his description of the Eridanus with all the poetical stories. Addison on Italy.
48. To Set on or upon. To animate; to instigate; to incite.
You had either never attempted this change, set on with hope, or never discovered it, stopt with dispair. Sidney.
He upbraids Iago, that he made himBrave me upon the watch; whereon it cameThat I was cast; and even now he spakeIago set him on. Shakesp. Othello.
Thou, traitor, hast set on they wife to this. Shakespeare.
Baruch setteth thee on against us, to deliver us unto the Chaldeans. Jer. xliii. 3.
He should be thought to be mad, or set upon and employed by his own or the malice of other men to abuse the duke. Claren.
In opposition sitsGrim death, my son and foe, who sets them on. Milton.
The vengeance of God, and the indignation of men, will join forces against an insulting baseness, when backed with greatness and set on by misinformation. South's Serm.
The skill used in dressing up power, will serve only to give greater edge to man's natural ambition: what can this do but set men on the more eagerly to scramble? Locke.
A prince's court introduces a kind of luxury, that sets every particular person upon making a higher figure than is consistent with his revenue. Addison.
49. To Set on or upon. To attack; to assault.
There you missing me, I was taken up by pyrates, who putting me under board prisoner, presently set upon another ship, and maintaining a long fight, in the end put them all to the sword. Sidney.
Cassio hath here been set on in the dark:He's almost slain, and Rodorigo dead. Shakes. Othello.
So other foes may set upon our back. Shakesp. H. VI.
Alphonsus, captain of another of the galleys, suffering his men to straggle too far into the land, was set upon by a Turkish pyrate, and taken. Knolles.
Of one hundred ships there came scarce thirty to work: howbeit with them, and such as came daily in, we set upon them, and gave them the chace. Bacon's War with Spain.
If I had been set upon by villains, I would have redeemed that evil by this which I now suffer. Taylor.
When once I am set upon, 'twill be too late to be whetting when I should be fighting. L'Estrange.
When some rival power invades a right,Flies set on flies, and turtles turtles fight. Garth's Dispens.
50. To Set on. To employ as in a task.
Set on thy wife t' observe. Shakesp. Othello.
51. To Set on or upon. To fix the attention; to determine to any thing with settled and full resolution.
It becomes a true lover to have your heart more set upon her good than your own, and to bear a tenderer respect to her honour than your satisfaction. Sidney.
Some I found wond'rous harsh,Contemptuous, proud, set on revenge and spite. Milton.
52. To Set out. To assign; to allot.
The rest, unable to serve any longer, or willing to fall to thrift, should be placed in part of the lands by them won at better rate than others, to whom the same shall be set out. Spens.
The squaring of a man's thoughts to the lot that providence has set out for him is a blessing. L'Estrange.
53. To Set out. To publish.
I will use no other authority than that excellent proclamation set out by the king in the first year of his reign, and annexed before the book of Common Prayer. Bacon.
If all should be set out to the world by an angry whig, the consequence must be a confinement of our friend for some months more to his garret. Swift.
54. To Set out. To mark by boundaries or distinctions of space.
Time and place, taken thus for determinate portions of those infinite abysses of space and duration, set out, or supposed to be distinguished from the rest by known boundaries, have each a twofold acceptation. Locke.
55. To Set out. To adorn; to embellish.
An ugly woman, in a rich habit set out with jewels, nothing can become. Dryden.
56. To Set out. To raise; to equip.
The Venetians pretend they could set out, in case of great necessity, thirty men of war, a hundred gallies, and ten galleasses. Addison on Italy.
57. To Set out. To show; to display; to recommend.
Barbarossa, in his discourses concerning the conquest of Africk, set him out as a most fit instrument for subduing the kingdom of Tunis. Knolles.
I could set out that best side of Luther, which our author, in the picture he has given us of him, has thrown into shade, that he might place a supposed deformity more in view. Atterb.
58. To Set out. To show; to prove.
Those very reasons set out how heinous his sin was. Atterb.
59. To Set up. To erect; to establish newly.
There are many excellent institutions of charity lately set up, and which deserve all manner of encouragement, particularly those which relate to the careful and pious education of poor children. Atterbury's Sermons.
Who could not win the mistress, woo'd the maid,Set up themselves, and drove a sep'rate trade. Pope.
60. To Set up. To build; to erect.
Their ancient habitations they neglect,And set up new: then, if the echo like notIn such a room, they pluck down those. Ben. Johnson's Catil.
Jacob took the stone, that he had for his pillow, and set it up for a pillar. Gen. xxviii. 18.
Saul set him up a place, and is passed on, and gone down to Gilgal. 1 Sa. xv. 12.
Such delight hath God in menObedient to his will, that he vouchsafesAmong them to set up his tabernacle. Milton's Paradise Lost.
Images were not set up or worshipped among the heathens, because they supposed the gods to be like them. Stillingfleet.
Statues were set up to all those who had made themselves eminent for any noble action. Dryden.
I shall shew you how to set up a forge, and what tools you must use. Moxon's Mech. Exer.
Patrons, who sneak from living worth to dead,With-hold the pension, and set up the head. Pope.
61. To Set up. To raise; to exalt; to put in power.
He was skilful enough to have lived still, if knowledge could be set up against mortality. Shakespeare.
I'll translate the kingdom from the house of Saul, and set up the throne of David over Israel. 2 Sa. iii. 10.
Of those that lead these parties, if you could take off the major number, the lesser would govern; nay, if you could take off all, they would set up one, and follow him. Suckling.
Homer took all occasions of setting up his own countrymen the Grecians, and of undervaluing the Trojan chiefs. Dryd.
Whatever practical rule is generally broken, it cannot be supposed innate; it being impossible that men should, without shame or fear, serenely break a rule which they could not evidently know that God had set up. Locke.
62. To Set up. To place in view.
He hath taken me by my neck, shaken me to pieces, and set me up for his mark. Job xvi. 12.
Scarecrows are set up to keep birds from corn and fruit. Bac.
Thy father's merit sets thee up to view,And shows thee in the fairest point of light,To make thy virtues or they faults conspicuous. Addison.
63. To Set up. To place in repose; to fix; to rest.
Whilst we set up our hopes here, we do not so seriously, as we ought, consider that God has provided another and better place for us. Wake.
64. To Set up. To raise by the voice.
My right eye itches, some good luck is near;Perhaps my Amaryllis may appear;I'll set up such a note as she shall hear. Dryden.
65. To Set up. To advance; to propose to reception.
The authors that set up this opinion were not themselves satisfied with it. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
66. To Set up. To raise to a sufficient fortune.
In a soldier's life there's honour to be got, and one lucky hit sets up a man for ever. L'Estrange.

Set (verb neuter)


Setaceous
Seta'ceous. adj. [seta, Latin.] Bristly; set with strong hairs, consisting of strong hairs.
The parent insect, with its stiff setaceous tail, terebrates the rib of leaf when tender; and makes way for its eggs into the very pitch. Derham.

Shab
To Shab. v.n. To play mean tricks; a low barbarous cant word.

Shabbily
Shábbily. adv. [from shabby.] Meanly; reproachfully; despicably; paltrily. A cant word.

Shabbiness
Shábbiness. n.s. [from shabby.] Meanness; paltriness.
 He exchanged his gay shabbiness of cloaths fit for a much younger man, to warm ones that would be decent for a much older one. Addis. Spectator.

Shabby
Shábby. adj. [A word that has crept into conversation and low writing; but ought not to be admitted into the language.] Mean; paltry.
 The dean was so shabby, and look'd like a ninny, That the captain suppos'd he was curate to Jenny. Swift.

Shail
To Shail. v.n. To walk sideways; a low word.
 Child, you must walk strait, without skewing and shailing to every step you set. L'Estrange.

Shall
Shall. v. defective. [sceal, Sax. is originally I owe, or I ought. In Chaucer, the faithe I shall to God, means the faith I owe to God: thence it became a sign of the future tense. The French use devoir, dois, doit, in the same manner, with a kind of future signification; and the Swedes have skall, and the Islanders skal, in the same sense. It has no tenses but shall future, and should imperfect.
The explanation of shall, which foreigners and provincials confound with will, is not easy; and the difficulty is increased by the poets, who sometimes give to shall an emphatical sense of will: but I shall endeavour, crassâ Minervâ, to show the meaning of shall in the future tense.]

 I Shall love. It will so happen that I must love; I am resolved to love.

 Shall I love? Will it be permitted me to love? Will you permit me to love? Will it happen that I must love?

 Thou Shalt love. I command thee to love; it is permitted thee to love: [in poetry or solemn diction] it will happen that thou must love.

 Shalt thou love? Will it happen that thou must love? Will it be permitted to thee to love?

 He Shall love. It will happen that he must love; it is commanded him that he love.
 It is a mind, that shall remain a poison where it is. — — Shall remain! Hear you this triton of the minnows? Mark you His absolute shall? Shakesp. Coriolanus.
         See Romulus the great: This prince a priestess of your blood shall bear, And like his sire in arms he shall appear. Dryden's Æn.
 That he shall receive no benefit from Christ, is the affirmation whereon all his despair is founded; and the one way of removing this dismal apprehension, is to convince him that Christ's death, and the benefits thereof, either do, or, if he perform the condition required of him, shall certainly belong to him. Hammond's Fundamentals.
 Shall he love? Is it permitted him to love? In solemn language, Will it happen that he must love?

 The plural persons follow the signification of the singulars.

Shark (noun)
Shark. n.s. [canis charcharias, Latin.]

 A voracious sea-fish.
 His jaws horrifick arm'd with threefold fate, The direful shark. Thomson's Summer.
 A greedy artful fellow; one who fills his pockets by sly tricks.
 David's messengers are sent back to him, like so many sharks and runnagates, only for endeavouring to compliment an ill-nature out of itself, and seeking that by petition which they might have commanded by their sword. South's Sermons.
 Trick; fraud; petty rapine.
 Wretches who live upon the shark, and other mens sins, the common prisoners of youth, equally desperate in their fortunes and their manners, and getting their very bread by the damnation of souls. South's Sermons.

Shell (noun)
Shell. n.s. [scýll, sceall, Saxon; schale, schelle, Dutch.]

 The hard covering of any thing; the external crust.
The sun is as the fire, and the exterior earth is as the shell of the eolipile, and the abyss as the water within it; now when the heat of the sun had pierced thro' the shell and reach'd the waters, it rarefy'd them. Burn. Theo. of the Earth.
Whatever we fetch from under ground is only what is lodged in the shell of the earth. Locke.
 The covering of a testaceous or crustaceous animal.
          Her women wearThe spoils of nations in an ear;Chang'd for the treasure of a shell,And in their loose attires do swell. Ben. Johns. Catiline.
          AlbionWas to Neptune recommended;Peace and plenty spread the sails:Venus, in her shell before him,From the sands in safety bore him. Dryden's Albion.
The shells served as moulds to this sand, which, when consolidated, and afterwards freed from its investient shell, is of the same shape as the cavity of the shell. Woodward.
He, whom ungrateful Athens could expel,At all times just, but when he sign'd the shell. Pope.
 The covering of the seeds of siliquous plants.
Some fruits are contained within a hard shell, being the seeds of the plants. Arbuthnot.
 The covering of kernels.
Chang'd loves are but chang'd sorts of meat;And when he hath the kernel eat,Who doth not throw away the shell? Donne.
 The covering of an egg.
          Think him as a serpent's egg,Which, hatch'd, would, as his kind, grow mischievous,And kill him in the shell. Shakes. Julius Cæsar.
 The outer part of an house.
The marquis of Medina Sidonia made the shell of a house, that would have been a very noble building, had he brought it to perfection. Addison on Italy.
 It is used for a musical instrument in poetry, from testudo, Latin; the first lyre being said to have been made by straining strings over the shell of a tortoise.
Less than a god they thought there could not dwellWithin the hollow of that shell,That spoke so sweetly. Dryden.
 The superficial part.
So devout are the Romanists about this outward shell of religion, that if an altar be moved, or a stone of it broken, it ought to be reconsecrated. Ayliffe's Parergon.

Shortsighted


Shot (noun)
Shot. n.s. [schot, Dutch; from shoot.]

 The act of shooting.
 A shot unheard gave me a wound unseen. Sidney.
                 Proud death! What feast is tow'rd in thy infernal cell, That thou so many princes at a shot So bloodily hast struck? Shakes. Hamlet.
 The missive weapon emitted by any instrument.
 I shall here abide the hourly shot Of angry eyes. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 At this booty they were joyful, for that they were supplied thereby with good store of powder and shot. Hayward.
 Above one thousand great shot were spent upon the walls, without any damage to the garrison. Clarendon.
 He caused twenty shot of his greatest cannon to be made at the king's army. Clarendon.
 Impatient to revenge the fatal shot, His right hand doubly to his left succeeds. Dryden.
 The flight of a shot.
 She sat over against him, a good way off, as it were a bow shot. Gen. xxi. 16.
 [Escot, French.] A sum charged; a reckoning.
 A man is never welcome to a place, 'till some certain shot be paid, and the hostess say welcome. Shakespeare.
 As the fund of our pleasure, let each pay his shot; Far hence be the sad, the lewd fop, and the sot. Ben. Johns.
         Shepherd, leave decoying, Pipes are sweet a Summer's day; But a little after toying, Women have the shot to pay. Dryden.
 He touch'd the pence when others touch'd the pot; The hand that sign'd the mortgage paid the shot. Swift.

Shot (verb)
Shot. The preterite and participle passive of shoot.
 On the other side a pleasant grove Was shot up high, full of the stately tree That dedicated is to Olympick Jove. Fairy Queen.
 Their tongue is as an arrow shot out, it speaketh deceit. Jer. ix. 8.
 The fortifier of Pendennis made his advantage of the commodiousness afforded by the ground, and shot rather at a safe preserving the harbour from sudden attempts of little fleets, than to withstand any great navy. Carew.
 He only thought to crop the flow'r, New shot up from a vernal show'r. Milton.
 From before her vanish'd night, Shot through with orient beams. Milton's Paradise Lost.
 Sometimes they shot out in length like rivers, and sometimes they flew into remote countries in colonies. Burnet.
 The same metal is naturally shot into quite different figures, as quite different kinds of them are of the same figure. Woodw.
 Prone on ocean in a moment flung, Stretch'd wide his eager arms, and shot the seas along. Pope.

Should
Should. v.n. [seude, sceoldan, Saxon.]

 This is a kind of auxiliary verb used in the conjunctive mood, of which the signification is not easily fixed.

 I Should go. It is my business or duty to go.

 If I Should go. If it happens that I go.

 Thou Should'st go. Thou oughtest to go.

 If thou Should'st go. If it happens that thou goest.

 The same significations are found in all the other persons singular and plural.
 Let not a desperate action more engage you Than safety should. Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
 Some praises come of good wishes and respects, when by telling men what they are, they represent to them what they should be. Bacon.
 To do thee honour I will shed their blood, Which the just laws, if I were faultless, should. Waller.
 So subjects love just kings, or so they should. Dryden.
 I conclude, that things are not as they should be. Swift.
 Should be. A proverbial phrase of slight contempt or irony.
 The girls look upon their father as a clown, and the boys think their mother no better than she should be. Addison.
 There is another signification now little in use, in which should has scarcely any distinct or explicable meaning. It should be differs in this sense very little from it is.
 There is a fabulous narration, that in the northern countries there should be an herb that groweth in the likeness of a lamb, and feedeth upon the grass. Bacon's Nat. History.

Side (adjective)


Side (noun)


Side (verb)


Sigh (noun)
Sigh. n.s. [from the verb.] A violent and audible emission of the breath which has been long retained, as in sadness.
Full often has my heart swoln with keeping my sighs imprisoned; full often have the tears I drove back from mine eyes, turned back to drown my heart. Sidney.
Love is a smoke rais'd with the fume of sighs; Being purg'd, a fire sparkling in lovers eyes. Shakespeare.
What a sigh is there! The heart is sorely charg'd. Shakesp.
Laughing, if loud, ends in a deep sigh; and all the pleasures have a sting in the tail, though they carry beauty in the face. Taylor.
In Venus' temple, on the sides were seen Issuing sighs, that smok'd along the wall. Dryden.

Sigh (verb active)
To Sigh. v.a. To lament; to mourn. Not in use.
 Ages to come, and men unborn,Shall bless her name and sigh her fate. Prior.

Sigh (verb neuter)
To Sigh. v.n. [ꞅıcan, ꞅıcꞇꞇan, Saxon; suchten, Dutch.] To emit the breath audibly, as in grief.
 I lov'd the maid I married; never man Sigh'd truer breath. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 I'll not be made a soft and dull-ey'd fool,To shake the head, relent, and sigh, and yield To Christian intercessors. Shakes. Merch. of Venice.
 He sighed deeply in this spirit, and saith, why doth this generation seek after a sign? Mar. viii. 12.
 For the oppression of the poor, for the sighing of the needy will I arise. Ps. xii. 5.
                       Happier he, Who seeks not pleasure through necessity, Than such as once on slipp'ry thrones were plac'd, And chasing, sigh to think themselves are chas'd. Dryden.
 The nymph too longs to be alone; Leaves all the swains, and sighs for one. Prior.
 Thus sighed he away the melancholy night. Arb. and Pope.

Sight
Sight. n.s. [ᵹꞅıð, Saxon; sicht, gesicht, Dutch.]

 Perception by the eye; the sense of seeing.
If bees go forth right to a place, they must needs have sight. Bacon.
O loss of sight, of thee I most complain!Blind among enemies, O worse than chains,Dungeon or beggary, decrepit age! Milton's Agonistes.
Things invisible to mortal sight. Milton.
'Tis still the same, although their airy shapeAll but a quick poetick sight escape. Denham.
My eyes are somewhat dimish grown;For nature, always in the right,To your decays adapts my sight. Swift.
 Open view; a situation in which nothing obstructs the eye.
                     Undaunted Hotspur Brings on his army, eager unto fight,And plac'd the same before the king in sight. Daniel.
Æneas cast his wond'ring eyes around,And all the Tyrrhene army had in sight,Stretched on the spacious plain for left to right. Dryden.
I met Brutidius in a mortal fright;He's dipt for certain, and plays least in sight. Dryd. Juven.
 Act of seeing or beholding.
Nine things to sight required are;The pow'r to see, the light, the visible thing,Being not too small, too thin, too nigh, too far,Clear space and time, the form distinct to bring. Davies.
Mine eyes pursu'd him still, but under shadeLost sight of him. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. iv.
What form of death could him affright,Who unconcern'd, with stedfast sight,Could view the surges mounting steep,And monsters rolling in the deep! Dryden's Horace.
Having little knowledge of the circumstances of those St. Paul writ to, it is not strange that many things lie concealed to us, which they who were concerned in the letter understood at first sight. Locke.
 Notice; knowledge.
It was writ as a private letter to a person of piety, upon an assurance that it should never come into any one's sight but her own. Wake.
 Eye; instrument of seeing.
From the depth of hell they lift their sight,And at a distance see superior light. Dryden.
 Aperture pervious to the eye, or other point fixed to guide the eye: as, the sights of a quadrant.
Their armed staves in charge, their beavers down,Their eyes of fire sparkling through sights of steel. Shakesp.
 Spectacle; show; thing wonderful to be seen.
Thus are my eyes still captive to one sight;Thus all my thoughts are slaves to one thought still. Sidney.
Them seem'd they never saw a sight so fairOf fowls so lovely, that they sure did deemThem heavenly born. Spenser.
                         Not an eyeBut is a-weary of thy common sight,Save mine, which hath desir'd to see thee more. Shakesp.
Moses said, I will turn aside and see this great sight, why the bush is not burnt. Ex. iii. 3.
 I took a felucca at Naples to carry me to Rome, that I might not run over the same sights a second time. Addison.
Not proud Olympus yields a nobler sight,Though gods assembled grace his tow'ring height,Than what more humble mountains offer here,Where, in their blessings, all those gods appear. Pope.
Before you pass th' imaginary sightsOf lords and earls, and dukes and garter'd knights,While the spread fan o'ershades your closing eyes,Then give one flirt, and all the vision flies. Pope.

Sighted
Síghted. adj. [from sight.] Seeing in a particular manner. It is used only in composition, as quicksighted, shortsighted.
As they might, to avoid the weather, pull the joints of the coach up close, so they might put each end down, and remain as discovered and open sighted as on horseback. Sidney.
The king was very quick sighted in discerning difficulties, and raising objections, and very slow in mastering them. Claren.

Sightfulness


Sightless


Sightly


Sigil
Sígil. n.s. [sigillum, Latin.] Seal.
         Sorceries to raise th' infernal pow'rs, And sigils fram'd in planetary hours. Dryd. Knight's Tale.

Sign (noun)


Sign (verb)


Signal (noun)


Singular
Síngular. adj. [singulier, Fr. singularis, Latin.]

 Single; not complex; not compound.
 That idea which represents one particular determinate thing is called a singular idea, whether simple, complex, or compound. Watts.
 [In grammar.] Expressing only one; not plural.
 If St. Paul's speaking of himself in the first person singular has so various meanings, his use of the first person plural has a greater latitude. Locke.
 Particular; unexampled.
             So singular a sadness Must have a cause as strange as the effect. Denham's Sophy.
 Doubtless, if you are innocent, your case is extremely hard, yet it is not singular. Female Quixote.
 Having something not common to others. It is commonly used in a sense of disapprobation, whether applied to persons or things.
               His zeal Not seconded, as singular and rash. Milton.
 It is very commendable to be singular in any excellency, and religion is the greatest excellency: to be singular in any thing that is wise and worthy is not a disparagement, but a praise. Tillots.
 Alone; that of which there is but one.
 These busts of the emperors and empresses are all very scarce, and some of them almost singular in their kind. Addis.

Skeleton
Skéleton. n.s. [σκελετὸς, Greek.]

 [In anatomy.] The bones of the body preserved together as much as can be in their natural situation. Quincy.
 When rattling bones together fly, From the four corners of the sky; When sinews o'er the skeletons are spread, Those cloth'd with flesh, and life inspires the dead. Dryden.


 A skeleton, in outward figure,  His meagre corps, though full of vigour, Would halt behind him were it bigger.

  Swift.



 The compages of the principal parts.
  The great structure itself, and its great integrals, the heavenly and elementary bodies, are framed in such a position and situation, the great skeleton of the world. Hale.
 The schemes of any of the arts or sciences may be analyzed in a sort of skeleton, and represented upon tables, with the various dependencies of their several parts. Watts.

Slab (adjective)
Slab. adj. [A word, I suppose, of the same original with slabber, or slaver.] Thick; viscous; glutinous.
Nose of Turk, and Tartar's lips;


Finger of birth-strangl'd babe,Ditch-deliver'd by a drab;Make the gruel thick and slab.

  Shakesp. Macbeth.

Slab (noun)
Slab. n.s.

 A puddle. Ainsworth.

 A plane of stone: as, a marble slab.

Slabber (verb active)
To Slábber. v.a.

 To smear with spittle.
He slabbered me all over, from cheek to cheek, with his great tongue. Arbuthnot's History of John Bull.
 To shed; to spill.
The milk pan and cream pot so slabber'd and sost,That butter is wanting, and cheese is half lost. Tusser.

Slabber (verb neuter)
To Slábber. v.n. [slabben, slabberen, Dutch.]

 To let the spittle fall from the mouth; to drivel.

 To shed or pour any thing.

Slaver (noun)
Sláver. n.s. [saliva, Latin. slæfa, Islandick.] Spittle running from the mouth; drivel.
Mathiolus hath a passage, that a toad communicates its venom not only by urine, but by the humidity and slaver of its mouth, which will not consist with truth. Brown.
Of all mad creatures, if the learn'd are right,It is the slaver kills, and not the bite. Pope.

Slaver (verb active)
To Sláver. v.a. To smear with drivel.
Twitch'd by the slave he mouths it more and more,'Till with white froth his gown is slaver'd o'er. Dryden.

Slaver (verb neuter)
To Sláver. v.n. [from the noun.]

 To be smeared with spittle.
                Should ISlaver with lips, as common as the stairsThat mount the capitol; join gripes with handsMade hard with hourly falshood as with labour. Shakesp.
 To emit spittle.
Miso came with scowling eyes to deliver a slavering good-morrow to the two ladies. Sidney.
Why must he sputter, spawl, and slaver it;In vain, against the people's fav'rite? Swift.

Slaverer
Sláverer. n.s. [slabbaerd, Dutch; from slaver.] One who cannot hold his spittle; a driveller; an ideot.

Slide (noun)
Slide. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Smooth and easy passage.
We have some slides or relishes of the voice or strings, continued without notes, from one to another, rising or falling, which are delightful. Bacon's Natural History.
Kings that have able men of their nobility shall find ease in employing them, and a better slide into their business; for people naturally bend to them. Bacon.
 Flow; even course.
There be, whose fortunes are like Homer's verses, that have a slide and easiness more than the verses of other poets. Bac.

Slide (verb active)
To Slide. v.a. To put imperceptibly.
Little tricks of sophistry by sliding in, or leaving out such words as entirely change the question, should be abandoned by all fair disputants. Watts.

Slide (verb neuter)
To Slide. v.n. slid, preterite; slidden, participle pass. [ꞅlıꝺan, ꞅlıꝺnꝺ, sliding, Saxon; slijden, Dutch; ys-lithe, Welsh.]

 To pass along smoothly; to slip; to glide.
 Sounds do not only slide upon the surface of a smooth body, but communicate with the spirits in the pores of the body. Bacon's Natural History.
Ulysses, Sthenelus, Tisander slide Down by a rope, Machaon was their guide. Denham.
 To move without change of the foot.
Oh Ladon, happy Ladon, rather slide than run by her, lest thou shouldt make her legs slip from her. Sidney.
Smooth sliding without step. Milton.
He that once sins, like him that slides on ice, Goes swiftly down the slippery ways of vice: Though conscience checks him, yet those rubs gone o'er, He slides on smoothly, and looks back no more. Dryden.
 To pass inadvertently.
Make a door and a bar for thy mouth: beware thou slide not by it. Ecclus xxviii. 26.
 To pass unnoticed.
In the princess I could find no apprehension of what I said or did, but with a calm carelessness, letting every thing slide justly, as we do by their speeches, who neither in matter nor person do any way belong unto us. Sidney.
 To pass along by silent and unobserved progression.
                         Thou shalt Hate all, shew charity to none; But let the famisht flesh slide from the bone, Ere thou relieve the beggar. Shakespeare.
 Then no day void of bliss, of pleasure leaving, Ages shall slide away without perceiving. Dryden.
 Rescue me from their ignoble hands: Let me kiss yours when you my wound begin, Then easy death will slide with pleasure in. Dryden.
 Their eye slides over the pages, or the words slide over their eyes, and vanish like a rhapsody of evening tales. Watts.
 To pass silently and gradually from good to bad.
 Nor could they have slid into those brutish immoralities of life, had they duly manured those first practical notions and dictates of right reason. South.
 To pass without difficulty or obstruction.
 Such of them should be retained as slide easily of themselves into English compounds without violence to the ear. Pope.
 Begin with sense, of ev'ry art the soul, Parts answ'ring parts shall slide into a whole; Nature shall join you, time shall make it grow A work to wonder at. Pope.
 To move upon the ice by a single impulse, without change of foot.
 The gallants dancing by the river side, They bathe in summer, and in winter slide. Waller.
 To fall by errour.
 The discovering and reprehension of these colours cannot be done but out of a very universal knowledge of things, which so cleareth man's judgment, as it is the less apt to slide into any errour. Bacon.
 To be not firm.
                             Ye fair! Be greatly cautious of your sliding hearts. Thomson.
 To pass with a free and gentle course or flow.

Slobber
Slóbber. n.s. [glavoerio, Welsh.] Slaver. See Slaver.

Slubber
To Slúbber. v.a. [Probably from lubber.]

 To do any thing lazily, imperfectly, or with idle hurry.
Nature shewed she doth not like men, who slubber up matters of mean account. Sidney.
Bassanio told him, he would make some speedOf his return: he answer'd, do not so,Slubber not business for my sake. Shakesp. Merch. of Venice.
As they are slubbered over, the malignity that remains will show itself in some chronick disease, or in some species of the lues venerea. Wiseman's Surgery.
 To stain; to daub. [This seems to be from slobber, slabber, or slaver.]
You must be content to slubber the gloss of your new fortunes, with this more stubborn and boisterous expedition. Shak.
 To cover coarsely or carelessly.
A man of secret ambitious ends, and proportionate counsels, smothered under the habit of a scholar, and slubbered over with a certain rude and clownish fashion, that had the semblance of integrity. Wotton.

Slubberdegullion
Slúbberdegullion. n.s. [I suppose a cant word without derivation.] A paltry, dirty, sorry wretch.
 Quoth she, although thou hast deserv'd, Base slubberdegullion, to be serv'd As thou did'st vow to deal with me, If thou had'st got the victory. Hudibras.

Smell a Rat
To smell a Rat. To be put on the watch by suspicion as the cat by the scent of a rat; to suspect danger.
 Quoth Hudibras, I smell a rat, Ralpho, thou dost prevaricate. Hudibras, p. i.

Snake
Snake. n.s. [ꞅnaca; snake, Dutch.] A serpent of the oviparous kind, distinguished from a viper. The snake's bite is harmless.  Snake in poetry is a general term for a viper.
         Glo'ster's shew beguiles him; As the snake, roll'd in a flow'ry bank, With shining checker'd slough, doth sting a child, That for the beauty thinks it excellent. Shakes. Hen. VI.
We have scotch'd the snake, not killed it: She'll close, and be herself; whilst our poor malice Remains in danger of her former teeth. Shakesp. Macbeth.
The parts must have their outlines in waves, resembling the gliding of a snake upon the ground:  they must be smooth and even. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
Nor chalk, nor crumbling stones, the food of snakes That work in hollow earth their winding tracks. Dryden.

Snow (noun)
Snow. n.s. [snaw, Saxon; snee, Dutch.] The small particles of water frozen before they unite into drops. Locke
Benaiah slew a lion in a pit, in time of snow. 2 Sa. xxiii.
Drought and heat consume snow waters. Job xxiv. 19.
He gives the Winter's snow her airy birth,And bids her virgin fleeces clothe the earth. Sandys.

Snow (verb active)
To Snow. v.a. To scatter like snow.
If thou be'st born to see strange sights,Ride ten thousand days and nights,'Till age snow white hairs on thee. Donne.

Snow (verb neuter)
To Snow. v.n. [snawan, Saxon; sneeuwen, Dutch.] To have snow fall.

Snudge
To Snudge. v.n. [sniger, Danish.] To lie idle, close, or snug.
Now he will fight it out, and to the wars; Now eat his bread in peace, And snudge in quiet; now he scorns increase; Now all day spares. Herbert.

Snuff (noun)
Snuff. n.s. [snuf, Dutch, snot.]

 Snot. In this sense it is not used.

 The useless excrescence of a candle: whence moucher la chandelle.
             My great affliction, If I could bear longer, and not fall To quarrel with your opposeless wills, My snuff and loathed part of nature should Burn itself out. Shakesp. King Lear.
     But dearest heart, and dearer image, stay! Alas! true joys at best are dreams enough:     Though you stay here, you pass too fast away; For even at first life's taper is a snuff. Donne.
 The snuff-dishes shall be of pure gold. Ex. xxv. 38.
 If the liquor be of a close and glutinous consistency, it may burn without any snuff, as we see in camphire, and some other bituminous substances; and most of the ancient lamps were of this kind, because none have been found with such wicks. Wilk.
 A candle almost burnt out.
                             Lamentable! To hide me from the radiant sun, and solace I' th' dungeon by a snuff. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 The fired wick of a candle remaining after the flame.
 A torch, snuff and all, goes out in a moment, when dipped into the vapour. Addison on Italy.
 Resentment expressed by snifting; perverse resentment.
             What hath been seen Either in snuffs or packings of the duke's, Or the hard rein which both of them have borne Against the old kind king. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Jupiter took snuff at the contempt, and punished him: he sent him home again. L'Estrange.
 Powdered tobacco taken by the nose.
 Just where the breath of life his nostrils drew, A charge of snuff the wily virgin threw; The gnomes direct to ev'ry atom just The pungent grains of titillating dust. Pope.

Snuff (verb active)
To Snuff. v.a. [snuffen, Dutch.]

To draw in with the breath.
A heifer will put up her nose, and snuff in the air against rain. Bacon.
             With delight he snuff'd the smell Of mortal change on earth. Milton's Paradise Lost.


He snuffs the wind, his heels the sand excite; But when he stands collected in his might, He roars and promises a more successful fight. Dryden.




             The youth Who holds the nearest station to the light, Already seems to snuff the vital air, And leans just forward on a shining spear. Dryden's Æn.
My troops are mounted; their Numidian steeds Snuff up the wind, and long to scour the desart. Addison.
My nag's greatest fault was snuffing up the air about Brackdenstown, whereby he became such a lover of liberty, that I could scarce hold him in. Swift.
To scent.
The cow looks up, and from afar can find
The change of heav'n, and snuffs it in the wind. Dryden.
For thee the bulls rebellow through the groves, And tempt the stream, and snuff their absent loves. Dryden.
O'er all the blood-hound boasts superior skill, To scent, to view, to turn, and boldly kill! His fellows vain alarms rejects with scorn, True to the master's voice, and learned horn: His nostrils oft, if ancient fame sing true, Trace the fly felon through the tainted dew: Once snuffd, he follows with unalter'd aim, Nor odours lure him from the chosen game; Deep-mouth'd he thunders, and inflam'd he views, Springs on relentless, and to death pursues. Tickell.
To crop the candle.
The late queen's gentlewoman! To be her mistress' mistress! This candle burns not clear: 'tis I must snuff it, And out it goes. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
Against a communion-day our lamps should be better dressed, and our lights snuffed, and our religion more active. Taylor's worthy Communicant.
You have got An office for your talents fit, To snuff the lights, and stir the fire, And get a dinner for your hire. Swift.

Snuff (verb neuter)
To Snuff. v.n.

To snort; to draw breath by the nose.
The fury fires the pack, they snuff, they vent, And feed their hungry nostrils with the scent. Dryd. Æn.
Says Humpus, sir, my master bad me pray Your company to dine with him to-day: He snuffs, then follows, up the stairs he goes; Never pulls off his hat, nor cleans his shoes. King.
To snift in contempt.
Ye said, what a weariness is it, and ye have snuff'd at it. Mal. ii.  13.

Snuffbox
Snu'ffbox. n.s. [snuff and box.] The box in which snuff is carried.
If a gentleman leaves a snuffbox on the table, and goeth away, lock it up as part of your vails. Swift.
Sir Plume, of amber snuffbox justly vain, And the nice conduct of a clouded cane. Pope.

Snuffers
Snu'ffers. n.s. [from snuff.] The instrument with which the candle is clipped.
When you have snuffed the candle, leave the snuffers open. Swift's Directions to the Butler.

Snuffle
To Snu'ffle. v.n. [snuffelen, Dutch.] To speak through the nose; to breath hard through the nose.
A water-spaniel came down the river, shewing that he hunted for a duck; and with a snuffling grace, disdaining that his smelling force could not as well prevail through the water as through the air, waited with his eye to see whether he could espy the duck's getting up again. Sidney.
             Bagpipes of the loudest drones, With snuffling broken-winded tones, Whose blasts of air in pockets shut, Sound filthier than from the gut. Hudibras.
It came to the ape to deliver his opinion, who smelt and snuffled, and considered on't. L'Estrange.
            One clad in purple, Eats and recites some lamentable rhyme; Some senseless Phillis in a broken note, Snuffling at nose, and croaking in his throat. Dryden.

Snug (adjective)
Snug. adj. [from the verb.]

Close; free from any inconvenience.
They spy'd a country farm,Where all was snug, and clean, and warm;For woods before, and hills behind,Secur'd it from both rain and wind. Prior.
Close; out of notice.
                         At Will'sLie snug, and hear what criticks say. Swift.
Silly or insidiously close.
Did I not see you, rascal, did I not!When you lay snug to snap young Damon's goat? Dryden.

Snug (verb)
To Snug. v.n. [sniger, Dutch.] To lie close; to snudge.
There snugging well, he well appear'd content, So to have done amiss, so to be shent. Sidney.
As the loving couple lay snugging together, Venus, to try if the cat had changed her manners with her shape, turned a mouse loose into the chamber. L'Estrange.

Snuggle
To Snúggle. v.n. [from snug.] To lie close; to lie warm.

So
So. adv. [ꞅƿa, Saxon; soo, Dutch; so, German.]

In like manner. It answers to as either preceding or following. Noting comparison.
As whom the fables feign of monstrous size, Titanian or earthborn that warr'd on Jove, So stretch'd out huge in length the arch fiend lay. Milton.
 Thick as autumnal leaves that strew the brooks In Valombrosa, where th' Etrurian shades High over-arch'd embow'r, so thick bestrewn Abject and lost lay these. Milton.
Tir'd at first sight with what the muse imparts, In fearless youth we tempt the heights of arts; So pleas'd at first the towering Alps we try, Mount o'er the vales, and seem to tread the sky. Pope.
As into air the purer spirits flow, And sep'rate from their kindred dregs below, So flew her soul to its congeneal place. Pope.
To such a degree.
Why is his chariot so long in coming? Judg. v. 28.
Can nothing great, and at the height, Remain so long, but its own weight Will ruin it? Or is't blind chance That still desires new states t' advance. Ben. Johns. Catiline.
Amoret, my lovely foe, Tell me where thy strength does lie; Where the pow'r that charms us so, In thy soul, or in thy eye? Waller.
I viewed in my mind, so far as I was able, the beginning and progress of a rising world. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
Since then our Arcite is with honour dead, Why should we mourn that he so soon is freed. Dryden.
Upon our first going into a company of strangers, our benevolence or aversion rises towards several particular persons, before we have heard them speak, or so much as know who they are. Addison's Spectator.
We think our fathers fools, so wise we're grown: Our wiser sons, no doubt, will think us so. Pope.
In such a manner.

It is regularly answered by as or that, but they are sometimes omitted.
So frown'd the mighty combatants, that hell Grew darker at their frown. Milton.
There's no such thing, as that we beauty call,                 It is mere cosenage all;                 For though some long ago Lik'd certain colours mingled so and so, That doth not tie me now from chusing new. Suckling.
There is something equivalent in France and Scotland; so as 'tis a very hard calumny upon our soil to affirm that so excellent a fruit will not grow here. Temple.
We may be certain that man is not a creature that hath wings; because this only concerns the manner of his existence; and we seeing what he is, may certainly know that he is not so or so. Locke.
I shall minutely tell him the steps by which I was brought into this way, that he may judge whether I proceeded rationally, if so be anything in my example is worth his notice. Locke.
This gentleman is a person of good sense, and knows that he is very much in sir Roger's esteem, so that he lives in the family rather as a relation than dependent. Addison.
In the same manner.
Of such examples add me to the roll; Me easily indeed mine may neglect, But God's propos'd deliverance not so. Milton.
To keep up the tutor's authority, use him with great respect yourself, and cause all your family to do so too. Locke.
According to the multifariousness of this immutability, so are the possibilities of being. Norris.
Thus; in this manner.
Not far from thence the mournful fields appear, So call'd from lovers that inhabit there. Dryden.
Does this deserve to be rewarded so? Did you come here a stranger or a foe? Dryden.
 It concerns every man, with the greatest seriousness, to enquire into those matters whether they be so or not. Tillotson.
 No nation ever complained they had too broad, too deep, or too many rivers; they understand better than so, how to value those inestimable gifts of nature. Bentley.
So when the first bold vessel dar'd the seas, High on the stern the Thracian rais'd his strain. Pope.
 Whether this be from an habitual motion of the animal spirits, or from the alteration of the constitution, by some more unaccountable way, this is certain that so it is. Locke.
Therefore; for this reason; in consequence of this.
 The god, though loth, yet was constrain'd t'obey;For longer time than that, no living wight,Below the earth, might suffer'd be to stay:So back again him brought to living light. Fairy Queen.
If he set industriously and sincerely to perform the commands of Christ, he can have no ground of doubting but it shall prove successful to him, and so all that he hath to do is to endeavour by prayer and use of the means, to qualify himself for this blessed condition. Hammond's Fundamentals.
Some are fall'n, to disobedience fall'n; And so from heaven to deepest hell. Milton's Paradise Lost.
God makes him in his own image an intellectual creature, and so capable of dominion. Locke.
On these terms; noting a conditional petition: answered by at.
O goddess! tell what I would say, Thou know'st it, and I feel too much to pray, So grant my suit, as I enforce my might, In love to be thy champion. Dryden's Knight's Tale.
Here then exchange we mutually forgiveness:So may the guilt of all my broken vows,My perjuries to thee be all forgotten;As here my foul acquits thee of my death,As here I part without an angry thought. Rowe.
So may kind rains their vital moisture yield, And swell the future harvest of thy field. Pope.
Provided that; on condition that; modo.
                         Be not sad: Evil into the mind of God or man May come and go, so unapprov'd, and leave No spot or blame behind. Milton's Paradise Lost.
So the doctrine be but wholsome and edifying, though there should be a want of exactness in the manner of speaking or reasoning, it may be overlooked. Atterbury.
Too much of love thy hapless friend has prov'd, Too many giddy foolish hours are gone; May the remaining few know only friendship: So thou, my dearest, truest, best Alicia, Vouchsafe to lodge me in thy gentle heart, A partner there; I will give up mankind. Rowe.
In like manner; noting concession of one proposition and assumption of another, answering to as.
As a war should be undertaken upon a just motive, so a prince ought to consider the condition he is in when he enters on it. Swift.
It sometimes answers to the word or sentence going before, and returns the sense.
 Who thinks his wife is virtuous, though not so, Is pleas'd and patient till the truth he know. Denham.
Angling is something like poetry, men are to be born so. Walton's Angler.
One may as well say, that the conflagration shall be only national, as to say that the deluge was so. Burnet. However soft within themselves they are, To you they will be valiant by despair; For having once been guilty, well they know To a revengeful prince they still are so. Dryden.
 He was great ere fortune made him so. Dryden.
I laugh at everyone, said an old cynic, who laughs at me. Do you so? replied the philosopher; then you live the merriest life of any man in Athens. Addison.
They are beautiful in themselves, and much more so in that noble language peculiar to that great poet. Addison.
Common-place books have long been used by industrious young divines, and still continue so. Swift.
As to his using ludicrous expressions, my opinion is, but they are not so. Pope.
The blest to-day is as completely so, As who began a thousand years ago. Pope.
Thus it is; this is the state.
How sorrow shakes him! So, now the tempest tears him up by th' roots, And on the ground extends the noble ruin. Dryden.
At this point; at this time.
                     When With wild wood-leaves and weeds I ha' strew'd his grave, And on it said a century of prayers, Such as I can, twice o'er, I'll weep and sigh; And, leaving so his service, follow you. Shakespeare.
It notes a kind of abrupt beginning. Well.
O, so, and had you a council Of ladies too? who was your speaker, Madam? Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
It sometimes is little more than an expletive, though it implies some latent or surd comparison.
An astringent is not quite so proper, where relaxing the urinary passages is necessary. Arbuthnot.
A word of assumption; thus be it.
There is Percy; if your father will do me any honour, so; if not, let him kill the next Percy himself. Shakespeare.
I will never bear a base mind: if it be my destiny, so: if it be not, so. No man is too good to serve his prince. Shak.
A form of petition.
Ready are th' appellant and defendant, The armourer and his man, to enter the lists, So please your highness to behold the fight. Shakespeare.
So much as. However much. This is, I think, an irregular expression.
So much as you admire the beauty of his verse, his prose is full as good. Pope.
So so. An exclamation after some thing done or known.
I would not have thee linger in thy pain: So so. Shakespeare's Othello.
So so; it works: now mistress, sit you fast. Dryden.
So so. [cosi cosi, Italian.] Indifferently; not much amiss or well.
He's not very tall; yet for his years he's tall; His leg is but so so: and yet 'tis well. Shakespeare.
Deliver us from the nauseous repetition of As and So, which some so so writers, I may call them so, are continually sounding in our ears. Felton on the Classicks.
So then. Thus then it is that; therefore.
So then the Volscians stand; but as at first Ready, when time shall prompt them, to make road Upon's again. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.
To a war are required a just quarrel, sufficient forces, and a prudent choice of the designs: so then, I will first justify the quarrel, balance the forces, and propound variety of designs. Bacon's War With Spain.

Soak (verb neuter)


Sofa
Sófa. n.s. [I believe an eastern word.] A splendid seat covered with carpets.
 The king leaped off from the sofa on which he sat, and cried out, 'tis my Abdallah! Guardian.

Soho
Soho. interj. A form of calling from a distant place.

Solander
Solánder. n.s. [soulandres, Fr.] A disease in horses. Dict.

Soldan
Sóldan. n.s. [for sultan.] The emperor of the Turks.
 They at the soldan's chair defy'd the best. Milton.

Solecism
Sólecism. n.s. [σολοικισμὸς.] Unfitness of one word to another; impropriety in language.  A barbarism may be in one word, a solecism must be of more.
 There is scarce a solecism in writing which the best author is not guilty of, if we be at liberty to read him in the words of some manuscript. Addison.

Solicitious
Solícitous. adj. [solicitus, Latin.] Anxious; careful; concerned. It has commonly about before that which causes anxiety; sometimes for or of. For is proper before something to be obtained.
 Our hearts are pure, when we are not solicitous of the opinion and censures of men, but only that we do our duty. Tayl.
 Enjoy the present, whatsoever it be, and be not solicitous for the future. Taylor's Rule of living holy.
 The colonel had been intent upon other things, and not enough solicitous to finish the fortifications. Clarendon.
 In providing money for disbanding the armies, upon which they are marvelously solicitous, there arose a question. Clarend.
 They who were in truth zealous for the preservation of the laws, were solicitous to preserve the king's honour from any indignity, and his regal power from violation. Clarendon.
 Laud attended on his majesty, which he would have been excused from, if that design had not been in view, to accomplish which he was solicitous for his advice. Clarendon.
 There kept their watch the legions, while the grand In council sat, solicitous what chance Might intercept their emperour sent. Milton's Par. Lost.
 Without sign of boast, or sign of joy, Solicitous and blank, he thus began. Milton's Parad. Reg.
 No man is solicitous about the event of that which he has in his power to dispose of. South's Sermons.
 You have not only been careful of my fortune, the effect of your nobleness, but you have been solicitous of my reputation, which is that of your kindness. Dryden.
 The tender dame, solicitous to know Whether her child should reach old age or no, Consults the sage Tiresias. Addison.

Solicitously


Solicitress


Solicitude


Solid (adjective)


Solid (noun)


Solidity


Solidly


Solidness


Solidungulous
Solidúngulous. adj. [solidus and ungula, Latin.] Whole-hoofed.
 It is set down by Aristotle and Pliny, that an horse and all solidungulous or whole-hoofed animals have no gall, which we find repugnant unto reason. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Solifidian
Solifídian. n.s. [solus and fides, Latin.] One who supposes only faith, not works, necessary to justification.
 It may be justly feared, that the title of fundamentals, being ordinarily confined to the doctrines of faith, hath occasioned, that great scandal in the church of God, at which so many myriads of solifidians have stumbled, and fallen irreversibly, by conceiving heaven a reward of true opinions. Hammond.

Soliloquy
Solíloquy. n.s. [soliloque, Fr. solus and loquor, Lat.] A discourse made by one in solitude to himself.
 The whole poem is a soliloquy: Solomon is the person that speaks: he is at once the hero and the author; but he tells us very often what others say to him. Prior.
 He finds no respite from his anxious grief, Then seeks from his soliloquy relief. Garth's Dispensatory.
 If I should own myself in love, you know lovers are always allowed the comfort of soliloquy. Spectator.

Solipede
Sólipede. n.s. [solus and pedes, Lat.] An animal whose feet are not cloven.
 Solipedes, or firm footed animals, as horses, asses, and mules, are in mighty number. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Solitaire
Solitáire. n.s. [solitaire, French.]

 A recluse; a hermit.
 Often have I been going to take possession of tranquillity, when your conversation has spoiled me for a solitaire. Pope.
 An ornament for the neck.

Solitarily


Solitariness


Solitary (adjective)


Solitary (noun)


Solitude
Sólitude. n.s. [solitude, French; solitudo, Latin.]

 Lonely life; state of being alone.
It had been hard to have put more truth and untruth together, in few words, than in that speech; whosoever is delighted with solitude, is either a wild beast or a god. Bacon.
 What call'st thou solitude? Is not the earth With various living creatures, and the air, Replenish'd, and all these at thy command To come, and play before thee? Milton's Paradise Lost.
 Such only can enjoy the country who are capable of thinking when they are there: then they are prepared for solitude, and in that solitude is prepared for them. Dryden.
 A lonely place; a desert.

Solo
Sólo. n.s. [Italian.] A tune played by a single instrument.

Solstice


Solve
To Solve. v.a. [solvo, Latin.] To clear; to explain; to untie an intellectual knot.
 He would solve high dispute With conjugal caresses. Milton.
 Do thou, my soul, the destin'd period wait, When God shall solve the dark decrees of fate; His now unequal dispensations clear, And make all wise and beautiful appear. Tickell.
 It is mere trifling to raise objections, merely for the sake of answering and solving them. Watts.

Solvible
Sólvible. adj. [from solve.] Possible to be cleared by reason or inquiry.
 Intellective memory I call an act of the intellective faculty, because it is wrought by it, though I do not inquire how or where, because it is not solvible. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Some (adjective)


Some (composition)


Something (adverb)
So'mething adv. In some degree.
The pain went away upon it; but he was something discouraged by a new pain falling some days after upon his elbow on the other side. Temple.

Something (noun)
Something. n.s. [ꞅumðınᵹ, Saxon.]

 Not nothing, though it appears not what; a thing or matter indeterminate.
                 When fierce Bavar Did from afar the British chief behold, Betwixt despair and rage, and hope and pain, Something within his warring bosom roll'd. Prior.
The force of the air upon the pulmonary artery is but small, in respect of that of the heart; but it is still something. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
You'll say the whole world has something to do, something to talk of, something to wish for, and something to be employed about; but pray put all these somethings together, and what is the sum total but just nothing. Pope's Letters.
Here she beholds the chaos dark and deep,Where nameless somethings in their causes sleep. Pope.
 More or less.
Something yet of doubt remains. Milton.
Years following years steal something ev'ry day,At least they steal us from ourselves away. Pope.
 Part.
Something of it arises from our infant state. Watts
 Distance not great.
I will acquaint you with the perfect spy o' th' time; for't must be done to-night, and something from the palace. Shakesp.

Sometime
So'metime. adv. [some and time.] Once; formerly.
What art thou that usurp'st this time of night, Together with that fair and warlike form, In which the majesty of buried Denmark Did sometime march? Shakesp. Hamlet.
Good sometime queen, prepare thee hence for France. Sh.

Sometimes
So'metimes. adv. [some and times.]

 Not never; now and then; at one time or other.
'Twill render me more equal, sometime superior. Milton.
It is good that we sometimes be contradicted, and that we always bear it well; for perfect peace cannot be had in this world. Taylor.
 At one time, opposed to sometimes, or to another time.
The body passive is better wrought upon at sometimes than at others. Bacon's Natural History.
Sometimes the one, and sometimes the other, may be glanced upon in these scripture descriptions. Burnet.
He writes not always of a piece, but sometimes mixes trivial things with those of greater moment: sometimes also, though not often, he runs riot, and knows not when he has said enough. Dryden's Fables, Preface.

Somewhat (adverb)


Somewhat (noun)


Somewhere
So'mewhere. adv. [some and where.] In one place or other; not nowhere.
                   Hopeless and forelorn They are return'd, and somewhere live obscurely. Denham.
Compressing two prisms hard together, that their sides, which by chance were a very little convex, might somewhere touch one another, I found the place in which they touched become absolutely transparent, as if they had there been one continued piece of glass. Newton's Opt.
Does something still, and somewhere yet remain, Reward or punishment? Prior
Of the dead we must speak gently; and therefore, as Mr. Dryden says somewhere, peace be to its manes. Pope

Somewhile


Somniferous


Somnifick


Somnolency


Son


Son-in-law


Sonata


Song


Songish


Songster
So'ngster. n.s. [from song.] A singer. Used of human singers, it is a word of slight contempt.
 The pretty songsters of the Spring with their various notes did seem to welcome him as he passed. Howel.
 Some songsters can no more sing in any chamber but their own, than some clerks read in any book but their own. L'Estr.
 Either songster holding out their throats, And folding up their wings, renew'd their notes. Dryden.

Songstress
So'ngstress. n.s. [from song.] A female singer.
Through the soft silence of the lightening night, The sober-suited songstress trills her lay. Thomson's Summer.

Soniferous
Soni'ferous. adj. [sous and fero, Latin.] Giving or bringing sound.
This will appear, let the subject matter of sounds be what it will; either the atmosphere, or the etherial part thereof, or soniferous particles of bodies. Derham.

Sonnet
So'nnet. n.s. [sonnet, French; sonnetto, Italian.]

 A short poem consisting of fourteen lines, of which the rhymes are adjusted by a particular rule.  It is not very suitable to the English language, and has not been used by any man of eminence since Milton.
    A book was writ of late call'd Terachordon,And woven close, both matter, form, and stile;The subject new: it walk'd the town a-while,    Numb'ring good intellects, now seldom por'd on:    Cries the stall-reader, Bless us, what a word onA title-page is this! and some in fileStand spelling false, while one might walk to Mile—    End-green.  Why is it harder, sirs, than Gordon,Colkitto, or Macdonnel, or Galasp?    Those rugged names to our like mouths grow sleek, That would have made Quintilian stare and gasp:     Thy age like ours, soul of sir John Cheek, Hated not learning worse than toad or asp,    When thou taught'st Cambridge and king Edward Greek. Milton.
 A small poem.
        Let us into the city presently, To sort some gentlemen well skill'd in musick; I have a sonnet that will serve the turn. Shakespeare.

Sonnetteer
Sonnette'er. n.s. [sonnetier, French; from sonnet.] A small poet, in contempt.
Assist me, some extemporal god of rhime; for I am sure I shall turn sonnetteer. Shakesp. Love's Labour's Lost.
He first thinks fit no sonnetteer advance His censure farther than the song or dance. Dyrden.
There are as many kinds of gardening as of poetry: your makers of parterres and flower-gardens are epigrammatists and sonnetteers in this art. Spectator.
What woful stuff this madrigal would be, In some starv'd hackney sonnetteer or me?But let a lord once own the happy lines,How the wit brightens!  How the style refines! Pope.

Sonorifick
Sonori'fick. adj. [sonorus and facio, Lat.] Producing sound.
If he should ask me why a clock strikes, and points to the hour; and I should say, it is by an indicating form and sonorifick quality, this would be unsatisfactory. Watt's Logick.

Sonorous
Sono'rous. adj. [sonore, French; sonorus, Latin.]

 Loud sounding; giving loud or shrill sound.  Bodies are distinguished as sonorous or unsonorous.
             All the while Sonorous metal blowing martial sounds; At which the universal host up-sent A shout that tore hell's concave. Milton's Paradise Lost.
 High sounding; magnificent of sound.
The Italian opera, amidst all the meanness and familiarity of the thoughts, has something beautiful and sonorous in the expression. Addison on Italy.

Sonorously


Sonorousness


Sonship


Soon


Soph
Soph. n.s. [from sophista, Latin.] A young man who has been two years at the university.
 Three Cambridge sophs, and three pert templars came, The same their talents, and their tastes the same; Each prompt to query, answer and debate, And smit with love of poesy and prate. Pope's Dunciad.

Sophistry


Sorcerer
So'rcerer n.s. [sorcier, French; sortiarius, low Latin.] A conjurer; an enchanter; a magician.
 They say this town is full of cozenage, As nimble jugglers that deceive the eye, Drug-working sorcerers that change the mind, Soul-killing witches that deform the body, And many such like libertines of sin. Shakespeare.
 The weakness of the power of witches upon kings and magistrates may be ascribed to the weakness of imagination; for it is hard for a witch or a sorcerer to put on a belief that they can hurt such. Bacon's Natural History.
 He saw a sable sorcerer arise, All sudden gorgon's hiss and dragon's glare, And ten horn'd fiends. Pope.
 The Egyptian sorcerers contended with Moses; but the wonders which Moses wrought did so far transcend the power of magicians, as made them confess it was the finger of God. Watts's Logick.

Sorceress
So'rceress. n.s. [Female of sorcerer.] A female magician; an enchantress.
 Bring forth that sorceress condemn'd to burn. Shakesp.
 Divers witches and sorceresses have fed upon men's flesh, to aid their imagination with high and foul vapours. Bacon.
                 The snaky sorceress that sat Just by hell-gate, and kept the fatal key, Ris'n, and with hideous outcry rush'd between. Milton.
 How cunningly the sorceress displays Her own transgressions, to upbraid me, mine. Milton.

Sorcery
So'rcery. n.s. Magick; enchantment; conjuration; witchcraft; charms.
                     This witch Sycorax, For mischiefs manifold, and sorceries terrible, Was banish'd. Shakespeare.
 Adders wisdom I have learn'd To fence my ear against thy sorceries. Milton.
 Actæon has long tracts of rich soil; but had the misfortune in his youth to fall under the power of sorcery. Tatler.

Sord
Sord. n.s. [from sward.] Turf; grassy ground.
 This is the prettiest low-born lass that ever ran on the green sord. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.
 An altar of grassy sord. Milton.

Sordes
So'rdes. n.s. [Latin.] Foulness; dregs.
 The sea washes off the soil and sordes wherein mineral mosses were involved and concealed, and thereby renders them more conspicuous. Woodward.

Sordet


Sordid


Sordidly


Sordidness


Sordine


Sore (adjective)


Sore (adverb)


Sore (noun)


Sorehon


Sorel


Sorely


Soreness


Sorites


Sorn


Sororicide


Sorrage


Sorrance


Sorrel
So'rrel. n.s. [ꞅuꞃ, Saxon; sorel, French.] This plant agrees with the dock in all its characters, and only differs in having an acid taste. Miller.
Of all roots of herbs the root of sorrel goeth the farthest into the earth.  It is a cold and acid herb that loveth the earth, and is not much drawn by the sun. Bacon.
Acid austere vegetables contract and strengthen fibres, as all kinds of sorrel, the virtue of which lie in acid astringent salt, a sovereign antidote against the putrescent bilious alkali. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Sorrowed


Sortal


Sortance


Soup


Souterrain
Sóuterrain. n.s. [souterrain, French.] A grotto or cavern in the ground. Not English.
 Defences against extremities of heat, as shade, grottoes, or souterrains, are necessary preservatives of health. Arbuthnot.

Southing


Souvenance
Sóuvenance. n.s. [French.] Remembrance; memory. A French word which with many more is now happily disused.


 If thou wilt renounce thy miscreance, Life will I grant thee for thy valiance, And all thy wrongs will wipe out of my souvenance.

  Spens.


 Gave wond'rous great countenance to the knight, That of his way he had no souvenance, Nor care of vow'd revenge. Spenser.

Sovereign (noun)


Sowbread


Spasm


Spatiate


Spatter (verb neuter)


Speculum
Spéculum. n.s. [Latin.] A mirrour; a looking-glass; that in which representations are formed by reflection.
A rough and coloured object may serve for a speculum, to reflect the artificial rainbow. Boyle on Colours.

Spermologist
Spermólogist. n.s. [σπερμολόγος.] One who gathers or treats of seeds. Dict.

Spet
To Spet. v.a. To bring or pour abundantly. [Spet in Scotland is a superabundance of water: as, that tide or fresh was a high spet.]
             Mysterious dame, That ne'er art call'd, but when the dragon womb Of Stygian darkness spets her thickest gloom, And makes one blot of all the air, Stop thy cloudy ebon chair. Milton.

Spew (verb neuter)
To Spew. v.n. To vomit; to ease the stomach.
         He could have haul'd in The drunkards, and the noises of the inn; But better 'twas that they should sleep or spew, Than in the scene to offend or him or you. Ben. Johnson.

Sphinx
Sphinx. n.s. [σφίγξ.]
The sphinx was a famous monster in Egypt, that remained by conjoined Nilus, having the face of a virgin, and the body of a lion. Peacham on Drawing.

Spiller


Spot (noun)


Spring (noun)


Spring (verb active)


Spring (verb neuter)


Squiny
To Squiny. v.n. To look asquint. A cant word.
 I remember thine eyes well enough: Do'st thou squiny at me? Shakespeare's King Lear.

Staff
Staff. n.s. plur. staves. [ꞅꞇæꝼ, Saxon; staff, Danish; staf, Dutch.]

 A stick with which a man supports himself in walking.
              It much would please him, That of his fortunes you would make a staff To lean upon. Shakes.p. Ant. and Cleopatra.
 Grant me and my people the benefit of thy chastisements, that thy rod as well as thy staff may comfort us. K. Charles.
 It is probable that he, who had met whole armies in battle, should now throw away his staff, out of fear of a dog. Broome.
 A prop; a support.
 Hope is a lover's staff; walk hence with that, And manage it against despairing thoughts. Shakespeare.
 The boy was the very staff of my age, my very prop. Shak.
 A stick used as a weapon; a club; the handle of an edged or pointed weapon. A club properly includes the notion of weight, and the staff of length.
 I cannot strike at wretched kernes, whose arms Are hir'd to bear their staves. Shakesp. Macbeth.
 He that bought the skin ran greater risque than t' other that sold it, and had the worse end of the staff. L'Estrange.
 With forks and staves the felon they pursue. Dryden.
 Any long piece of wood.
 He forthwith from the glitt'ring staff unfurl'd Th' imperial ensign. Milton.
 To his single eye, that in his forehead glar'd Like a full moon, or a broad burnish'd shield, A forky staff we dext'rously apply'd, Which, in the spacious socket turning round, Scoopt out the big round gelly from its orb. Addison.
 An ensign of an office; a badge of authority.
 Methought this staff, mine office-badge in court, Was broke in twain. Shakesp. Henry VI.
 [Stef, Islandick] A stanza; a series of verses regularly disposed, so as that, when the stanza is concluded, the same order begins again.
 Cowley found out that no kind of staff is proper for an heroick poem, as being all too lyrical; yet though he wrote in couplets, where rhyme is freer from constraint, he affects half verses. Dryden.

Stain (noun)
Stain. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Blot; spot; discoloration.
Nor death itself can wholly wash their stains;But long contracted filth ev'n in the soul remains:The reliques of inveterate vice they wear,And spots of sin. Dryden's Æn.
We no where meet with a more pleasing show than what appears in the heavens at the rising and setting of the sun, which is wholly made up of those different stains of light that shew themselves in clouds of a different situation. Addison.
Swift trouts diversify'd with crimson stains,And pikes, the tyrants of the wat'ry plains. Pope.
 Taint of guilt or infamy.
To solemn actions of royalty and justice their suitable ornaments are a beauty: are they only in religion a stain? Hooker.
Our opinion, concerning the force and virtue which such places have, is, I trust, without any blemish or stain of heresy. Hooker.
Then heav'n and earth renew'd, shall be made pureTo sanctity, that shall receive no stain. Milton's Par. Lost.
Ulysses bids his friends to cast lots; for if he had made the choice himself, they whom he had rejected might have judged it a stain upon them for want of merit. Broome.
 Cause of reproach; shame.
Hereby I will lead her that is the praise, and yet the stain of all womankind. Sidney.

Stain (verb)
To Stain. v.a. [ystaenio, Welsh, from ys and taenu.        Rhag Gwyar or Gnawd,    Afar ystaenawd. Taliessyn, an old British poet.]

 To blot; to spot; to maculate.
            Lend me a looking-glass;If that her breath will mist or stain the stone,Why then she lives. Shakespeare's King Lear.
        From the gash a streamHis armour stain'd, ere while so bright. Milton.
Embrace again, my sons: be foes no more,Nor stain your country with your children's gore. Dryden.
 To disgrace; to spot with guilt or infamy.
Of honour void, of innocence, of faith, of purity,Our wonted ornaments now soil'd and stain'd. Milton.

Stair
Stair. n.s. [ꞅꞇæᵹꞃ, Saxon; steghe, Dutch.] Steps by which we rise an ascent from the lower part of a building to the upper. Stair was anciently used for the whole order of steps; but stair now, if it be used at all, signifies, as in Milton, only one flight of steps.
A good builder to a high tower will not make his stair upright, but winding almost the full compass about, that the steepness be the more insensible. Sidney.
How many cowards, whose hearts are all as false As stairs of sand, wear yet upon their chins The beards of Hercules and frowning Mars! Shakespeare.
Slaver with lips as common as the stairs That mount the Capitol. Shakesp.
I would have one only goodly room above stairs, of some forty foot high. Bacon's Essays.
Sir James Tirrel repairing to the Tower by night, attended by two servants, stood at the stair-foot, and sent these two villains to execute the murder. Bacon.
There being good stairs at either end, they never went through each other's quarters. Clarendon.
The stairs were such as whereon Jacob saw Angels ascending and descending. Milton's Parad. Lost.
             Satan now on the lower stair, That scal'd by steps of gold to heav'n gate, Looks down with wonder at the sudden view Of all this world. Milton's Parad. Lost.
             Trembling he springs, As terror had increas'd his feet with wings; Nor staid for stairs; but down the depth he threw His body: on his back the door he drew. Dryden.

Starve (verb active)
To Starve. v.a.

 To kill with hunger.
 I cannot blame his cousin king, That wish'd him on the barren mountains starv'd. Shakesp.
 Hunger and thirst, or guns and swords, Give the same death in different words: To push this argument no further, To starve a man in law is murther. Prior.
 If they had died through fasting, when meat was at hand, they would have been guilty of starving themselves. Pope.
 To subdue by famine.
             Thy desires Are wolfish, bloody, starv'd, and ravenous. Shakespeare.
 He would have worn her out by slow degrees, As men by fasting starve th' untam'd disease. Dryden.
 Attalus endeavoured to starve Italy, by stopping their convoy of provisions from Africa. Arbuthnot on Coins.
 To kill with cold.
 From beds of raging fire to starve in ice Their soft ethereal warmth, and there to pine Immoveable, infix'd, and frozen round. Milton's Par. Lost.
 To deprive of force or vigour.
 The powers of their minds are starved by disuse, and have lost that reach and strength which nature fitted them to receive. Locke.

Starve (verb neuter)
To Starve. v.n. [ꞅꞇaꞃꝼan, Saxon; sterven, Dutch, to die.]

 To perish; to be destroyed. Obsolete.
 To her came message of the murderment, Wherein her guiltless friends should hopeless starve. Fairfax.
 To perish with hunger. It has with or for before the cause, of less properly.
 Were the pains of honest industry, and of starving with hunger and cold, set before us, no body would doubt which to chuse. Locke.
 An animal that starves of hunger, dies feverish and delirious. Arbuthnot.
 To be killed with cold.
 Have I seen the naked starve for cold, While avarice my charity controll'd? Sandys.
 To suffer extreme poverty.
 Sometimes virtue starves while vice is fed: What then! Is the reward of virtue bread? Pope.
 To be destroyed with cold.
 Had the seeds of the pepper-plant been born from Java to these northern countries, they must have starved for want of sun. Woodward's Natural History.

Stellation
Stellátion. n.s. [from stella] Emission of light as from a star.

Stentorophonick
Stentorophónick. adj. [from Stentor, the Homerical herald, whose voice was as loud as that of fifty men, and φωνὴ, a voice.] Loudly speaking or sounding.
 Of this stentorophonick horn of Alexander there is a figure preserved in the Vatican. Derham's Physico-Theology.

Steril
Stéril. adj. [sterile, French; sterilis, Latin] Barren; unfruitful; not productive; wanting fecundity.
            Our elders say,The barren, touched in this holy chase,Shake off their steril curse. Shakesp. Julius Cæsar.
Thy sea marge steril, and rocky hard. Shakes. Tempest.
In very steril years corn sown will grow to another kind. Bacon's Natural History.
To separate seeds, put them in water; such as are corrupted and steril swim. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
She is grown steril and barren, and her births of animals are now very inconsiderable. More's Antidote against Atheism.
When the vegetative stratum was once washed off by rains, the hills would have become barren, the strata below yielding only mere sterile and mineral matter, such as was inept for the formation of vegetables. Woodward.

Stone (adjective)
Stone. adj. Made of stone.
         Present her at the leet, Because she bought stone jugs, and no seal'd quarts. Shakesp.

Stone (noun)
Stone. n.s. [stains, Gothick; stan, Saxon; steen, Dutch.]

 Stone are bodies insipid, hard, not ductile or malleable, nor soluble in water. Woodward's Mth. Foss.
 We understand by the term stones fossile bodies, solid, not ductile under the hammer, fixed in the fire, not easily melted in it, and not to be dissolved by water.  Stones are arranged under two distinct series, the softer and the harder. Of the softer stones there are three general distinctions. 1. The foliaceous or flacky, as talk. 2. The fibrose, as the asbestus. 3. The granulated, as the gypsum. Of the harder stones there are also three general distinctions. 1. The opake stones, as limestone. 2. The semi-pellucid, as agate. 3. The pellucid, as crystal and the gems. Hill's Mat. Med.
 Should I go to church, and see the holy edifice of stone, And not bethink me strait of dang'rous rocks! Shakespeare.
 The English used the stones to reinforce the pier. Hayward.
 Piece of stone cut for building.
 He shall bring forth the head stone with shoutings. Zech. iv.
 Gem; precious stone.
             I thought I saw Wedges of gold, great anchors, heaps of pearl, Inestimable stones, unvalu'd jewels. Shakesp. Rich. III.
 Any thing made of stone.
         Lend me a looking-glass; If that her breath will mist or stain the stone, Why then she lives. Shakespeare.
 Calculous concretion in the kidneys or bladder; the disease arising from a calculus.
 A specifick remedy for preventing of the stone I take to be the constant use of alehoof-ale. Temple.
 A gentleman supposed his difficulty in urining proceeding from the stone. Wiseman's Surgery.
 The case which in some fruits contains the seed.
 To make fruits without core or stone is a curiosity. Bacon.
 Testicle.

 A weight containing fourteen pounds.
 Does Wood think that we will sell him a stone of wool for his counters? Swift.
 Stone is used by way of exaggeration.
 What need you be so boist'rous rough? I will not struggle, I will stand stone still. Shakesp. K. John.
 And there lies Whacum by my side, Stone dead, and in his own blood dy'd. Hudibras.
 The fellow held his breath, and lay stone still, as if he was dead. L'Estrange.
 She had got a trick of holding her breath, and lying at her length for stone dead. L'Estrange.
 The cottages having taken a country-dance together, had been all out, and stood stone still with amazement. Pope.
 To leave no Stone unturned. To do every thing that can be done for the production or promotion of any effect.
 Women, that left no stone unturn'd In which the cause might be concern'd, Brought in their children's spoons and whistles, To purchase swords, carbines, and pistols. Hudibras.
 He crimes invented, left unturn'd no stone To make my guilt appear, and hide his own. Dryden.

Stone (verb)
To Stone. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To pelt or beat or kill with stones.
 These people be almost ready to stone me. Ex. xvii. 4.
 Crucifixion was a punishment unknown to the Jewish laws, among whom the stoning to death was the punishment for blasphemy. Stephens's Sermons.
 To harden.
 Oh perjur'd woman! thou do'st stone my heart; And mak'st me call what I intend to do, A murder, which I thought a sacrifice. Shakesp. Othello.

Strawberry
Stráwberry. n.s. [fragaria, Latin.] A plant.
It hath a perennial fibrose root: the leaves are veined, growing upon each footstalk; the stalks trail upon the ground: the cup of the flower consists of one leaf, divided into ten equal parts, and expands in form of a star: the flower consists, for the most part, of five leaves, expanded in form of a rose, and having many stamina in the middle, round the base of the ovary: the fruit is globose or oval, and consists of a fleshy eatable pulp, full of protuberances.  The species are seven. Mill.
 The strawberry grows underneath the nettle, And wholesome berries thrive and ripen best, Neighbour'd by fruit of baser quality. Shak. Henry V.
 Content with food, which nature freely bred, On wildings and on strawberries they fed. Dryden.
 Strawberries, by their fragrant smell, seem to be cordial: the seeds obtained by shaking the ripe fruit in Winter, are an excellent remedy against the stone.  The juice of strawberries and limmons in spring-water is an excellent drink in bilious fevers. Arbuthnot on Diet.

String (noun)
String. n.s. [strinʒ, Saxon; streng, German and Danish; stringhe Dutch; stringo, Latin.]

 A slender rope; a small cord; any slender and flexible band; a riband; any thing tied.
Any lower bullet hanging upon the other above it, must be conceived, as if the weight of it were in that point where its string touches the upper. Wilkin's Dedalus.
Round Ormond's knee thou ty'st the mystick string,That makes the knight companion to the king. Prior.
 A thread on which any things are filed.
Their priests pray by their beads, having a string with a hundred of nutshels upon it; and the repeating of certain words with them they account meritorious. Stilingfleet.
 Any set of things filed on a line.
I have caught two of these dark undermining vermin, and intend to make a string of them, in order to hang them up in one of my papers. Addison's Spectator.
 The chord of a musical instrument.
                            The string that jarsWhen rudely touch'd, ungrateful to the sense,With pleasure feels the master's flying fingers,Swells into harmony, and charms the hearers. Rowe.
By the appearance they make in marble, there is not one string-instrument that seems comparable to our violins. Addis.
 A small fibre.
Duckweed putteth forth a little string into the water, from the bottom. Bacon.
In pulling broom up, the least strings left behind will grow. Mortimer's Husbandry.
 A nerve; a tendon.
The most piteous tale which in recounting,His grief grew puissant, and the strings of lifeBegan to crack. Shakespeare's King Lear.
The string of his tongue loosed. Mark xxvii. 35.
 The nerve of the bow.
The wicked bend their bow, they make ready their arrows upon the string. Psalm xi. 2.
 Any concatenation or series, as a string of propositions.

 To have two Strings to the bow. To have two views or two expedients; to have double advantage, or double security.
No lover has that pow'rT' enforce a desperate amour,As he that has two strings to's bow,And burns for love and money too. Hudibras.

Stultiloquence
Stultíloquence. n.s. [stultus and loquentia, Lat.] Foolish talk. Dict.

Suffraginous
Suffráginous. adj. [suffrago, Latin.] Belonging to the knee joint of beasts.
 In elephants, the bought of the forelegs is not directly backward, but laterally, and somewhat inward; but the hough or suffraginous flexure behind, rather outward. Brown.

Sug
Sug. n.s. [sugo, Latin, to suck.]
Many have sticking on them sugs, or trout-lice, which is a kind of worm like a clove or pin, with a big head, and sticks close to him and sucks his moisture. Walton.

Suggilate
To Súggilate. v.a. [suggillo, Latin.] To beat black and blue; to make livid by a bruise.
 The head of the os humeri was bruised, and remained suggilated long after. Wiseman's Surgery.

Suicide
Súicide. n.s. [suicidium, Latin.] Self-murder; the horrid crime of destroying one's self.
 Child of despair, and suicide my name. Savage.
 To be cut off by the sword of injured friendship is the most dreadful of all deaths, next to suicide. Clarissa.

Sully (noun)
Súlly. n.s. [from the verb.] Soil; tarnish; spot.
You laying these light sullies on my son,As 'twere a thing a little soil'd i' th' working. Shakesp.
A noble and triumphant merit breaks through little spots and sullies in his reputation. Addison's Spectator.

Sully (verb)
To Súlly. v.a. [souiller, French.] To soil; to tarnish; to dirt; to spot.
Silvering will sully and canker more than gilding. Bacon.
The falling temples which the gods provoke,And statues sully'd yet with sacrilegious smoke. Roscommon.
He's dead, whose love had sully'd all your reign,And made you empress of the world in vain. Dryden.
Lab'ring years shall weep their destin'd race,Charg'd with ill omens, sully'd with disgrace. Prior.
Let there be no spots to sully the brightness of this solemnity. Atterbury's Sermons.
Ye walkers too, that youthful colours wear,Three sullying trades avoid with equal care;The little chimney-sweeper skulks along,And marks with sooty stains the heedless throng. Gay.

Sultan
Súltan. n.s. [Arabick.] The Turkish emperour.
                 By this scimitar, That won three fields of sultan Solyman. Shakespeare.

Surreption
Surréption. n.s. [surreptus, Latin.] Surprise; sudden and unperceived invasion.
Sins compatible with a regenerate estate, are sins of a sudden surreption. Hammond.

Surreptitious
Surreptítious. adj. [surreptitius, Latin.] Done by stealth; gotten or produced fraudulently.
Scaliger hath not translated the first; perhaps supposing it surreptitious, or unworthy so great an assertion. Brown.
The Masorites numbered not only the sections and lines, but even the words and letters of the Old Testament, the better to secure it from surreptitious practices. Govern. of the Tongue.
A correct copy of the Dunciad, the many surreptitious ones have rendered necessary. Letter to Publ. of Pope's Dunciad.

Surreptitiously
Surreptítiously. adv. [from surreptitious.] By stealth; fraudulently.
Thou hast got it more surreptitiously than he did, and with less effect. Govern. of the Tongue.

Sursolid
Sursólid. [In algebra.] The fourth multiplication or power of any number whatever taken as the root. Trevoux.

Sursolid Problem
Sursólid Problem. [In mathematicks.] That which cannot be resolved but by curves of a higher nature than a conick section. Harris.

Sword
Sword. n.s. [sweord, Saxon; sweerd, Dutch.]

 A weapon used either in cutting or thrusting; the usual weapon of fights hand to hand.
 Old unhappy traitor, the sword is out That must destroy thee. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Each man took his sword, and slew all the males. Gen.
 Euryalus is the only peer that is described with a sword, which he gives to Ulysses to repair his injury. Broome.
 Destruction by war.
 The sword without, and terrour within. Deut. xxxii. 25.
 Vengeance of justice.

 Emblem of authority.
 This I, her sword bearer, do carry, For civil deed and military. Hudibras.

Syllable (noun)
Sýllable. n.s. [συλλαβὴ; syllabe, French.]

 As much of a word as is uttered by the help of one vowel, or one articulation.
          I heardEach syllable that breath made up between them. Shakesp.
There is that property in all letters of aptness to be conjoined in syllables and words, through the voluble motions of the organs from one stop or figure to another, that they modify and discriminate the voice without appearing to discontinue it. Holder's Elements of Speech.
 Any thing proverbially concise.
Abraham, Job, and the rest that lived before any syllable of the law of God was written, did they not sin as much as we do in every action not commanded? Hooker.
To-morrow, and to-morrow, and to-morrow,Creeps in this petty pace from day to day,To the last syllable of recorded time;And all our yesterdays have lighted foolsThe way to dusty death. Shakes. Macbeth.
He hath told so many melancholy stories, without one syllable of truth, that he hath blunted the edge of my fears. Swift.

Symphonious


Synalepha


Synarthrosis


Synchronical


Synchronism


Synecdoche


Synneurosis


Synonomise


Synthetick


Syringe
